Nebraska, session 109, LB261.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. DEFINITION OF APPROPRIATION PERIOD.
For purposes of this act and any other legislative bill passed by the One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, First or Second Session, which appropriates funds,
FY2024-25 means the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025; FY2025-26 means
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026; FY2026-27 means the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027; FY2027-28 means the period July 1, 2027,
through June 30, 2028; and FY2028-29 means the period July 1, 2028, through
June 30, 2029.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION LANGUAGE.
There are hereby appropriated, for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27, the sums set
forth in this act to each agency for each program from the respective funds for
the general operations of state government, postsecondary education, state aid,
capital construction projects, land acquisition, lease-purchase arrangements,
and major equipment acquisition, except as otherwise appropriated.
Sec. 3. REAPPROPRIATION OF BALANCE, FY2025-26 to FY2026-27.
In addition to the appropriations set forth in this act, there are hereby
reappropriated all unexpended appropriation balances existing on June 30, 2026,
for FY2026-27, to the respective agencies, programs, and funds listed in this
act, except as otherwise provided in this act.
Sec. 4. There are hereby reappropriated for each agency, program, and
fund for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27, any appropriation by the One Hundred Seventh
Legislature, First or Second Session, of the unexpended and unencumbered
appropriation balances of the Federal Funds allocated to the State of Nebraska
from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund pursuant to the federal
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, 42 U.S.C. 802, as amended, unless otherwise
indicated in this act and any other legislative bill passed by the One Hundred
Eighth Legislature, First or Second Session. Such reappropriation shall retain
any provided limitations established by the appropriating legislative bill
unless otherwise indicated within this act and any other legislative bill
passed by the One Hundred Seventh Legislature, Second Session, or the One
Hundred Eighth Legislature, First or Second Session.
Sec. 5. CERTIFIED ENCUMBRANCES.
All certified encumbrance amounts on June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, not
otherwise reappropriated pursuant to this act, are hereby appropriated for
FY2025-26 and FY2026-27, respectively, which amounts shall be in addition to
the amounts shown in this act.
Sec. 6. NEBRASKA ACCOUNTING SYSTEM MANUAL DEFINITIONS.
The definitions contained in the Nebraska Accounting System Manual, and
any amendments thereto, on file with the Clerk of the Legislature, are hereby
adopted by the Legislature as the definitions for this act, except as provided
in sections 9, 10, and 11 of this act.
Sec. 7. DRAWING AND PAYING WARRANTS.
The Director of Administrative Services shall draw warrants upon the
proper fund in the state treasury for an amount not to exceed the
appropriations set forth in this act upon presentation of proper documentation.
The State Treasurer shall pay the warrants out of the appropriate funds.
Sec. 8. BUDGET STATUS REPORTS.
All state agencies, boards, and commissions shall promptly establish their
detailed Budget Status Reports at the budget subprogram level in the Nebraska
Accounting System and adjust them as necessary during each fiscal year to
reflect the most current appropriations shown on the Allotment Status Report.
Sec. 9. GIFTS.
Any gift shall be accepted in accordance with the State Acceptance of
Gifts Act. The definitions in the State Acceptance of Gifts Act are hereby
adopted by the Legislature for purposes of this act.
Any gift made available to the State of Nebraska for any purpose or
purposes, together with the income from such gift, shall be allocated to the
state agency designated by the donor or, if no state agency is designated by
the donor, shall be used in accordance with Article VII, section 9, of the
Constitution of Nebraska.
At the discretion of the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services and the Accounting Administrator of
-1-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
the Department of Administrative Services, expenditures of funds from any gift
of money may be made through any existing or administratively created cash
fund, revolving fund, or trust fund, in which case the actual amount of the
gift is hereby appropriated to the expending agency, for the purpose or
purposes designated by the donor, in addition to the amounts appropriated in
this act. If no such cash fund, revolving fund, or trust fund exists, the
Accounting Administrator may create such fund as is necessary to properly and
separately account for the gift, in which case the actual amount of the gift is
hereby appropriated to the expending agency, for the purpose or purposes
designated by the donor, in addition to the amounts appropriated in this act.
This section shall not apply to the University of Nebraska.
Sec. 10. LIMITATION ON SALARIES, WAGES, AND PER DIEMS.
(1) For purposes of this act, (a) SALARY LIMIT shall mean total
expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems and (b) total
expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems shall mean all
remuneration paid to employees treated as taxable compensation by the Internal
Revenue Service or subject to social security coverage, specifically including
payments accounted for as vacation, holidays, sick leave, military leave,
funeral leave, maternity leave, administrative leave, compensatory time,
deferred compensation, or any other similar form, and amounts withheld pursuant
to law, but excluding state contributions for social security, retirement, and
employee insurance plans.
(2) Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
shall be limited to the amount shown except when federal funds in excess of the
amount shown are available and approved by the Governor. Expenditures for
permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from such grants shall be in
addition to the limitation on permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
otherwise shown in this act. No agency shall request any state funds for
continuation or replacement of any such personnel or activities in future
budget requests. To the extent feasible, requests for increases in the
limitation on permanent and temporary salaries and per diems shall be addressed
to the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature when the Legislature is in
session.
(3) Expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries resulting from
awards made to employees under sections 81-1346 to 81-1354 shall be in addition
to the limitations on permanent and temporary salaries and per diems otherwise
shown in this act.
(4) The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries
and per diems for FY2026-27 as enumerated in this act shall be the basis for
continuation funding for each fiscal year of the succeeding biennium.
(5) The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries
and per diems for FY2025-26 shall be increased by certified encumbrance amounts
from FY2024-25 for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems. The
limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for FY2026-27 shall be increased by certified encumbrance amounts from
FY2025-26 for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems. Encumbered
amounts shall be calculated in accordance with section 81-138.01.
(6) The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries
and per diems shall only apply to remuneration paid to state employees or per
diem payments made to members of state boards or commissions.
(7) The budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services may administratively increase the limitation on
expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems upon receipt of
a request for such increase from the director of a state agency certifying the
actual amount of the payment to a former employee of such agency, or such
employee's beneficiary upon the death of the employee, of accumulated vacation
and sick leave pursuant to section 81-1325 and the rules and regulations of the
State Personnel System governing such payments.
Sec. 11. It is the intent of the Legislature that state agencies may, at
their discretion, utilize employee furloughs as a short-term means of
addressing budgetary shortfalls. Furlough is defined as placing an employee in
a temporary, nonduty, nonpay status because of the lack of funds. An
intermittent furlough is a furlough action in which the nonduty, nonpay status
occurs discontinuously over a period of time rather than consecutively. It is
further intended that furloughs shall not adversely affect the employee and
employer health insurance premium contributions and service anniversary date,
nor shall leave earnings be prorated as a result of the furlough.
Sec. 12. It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriations for
capital facilities follow an orderly and reasonable process based upon defined
and documented need and an analysis of the utilization of existing facilities.
The biennial appropriations contained in this act covering FY2025-26 and
FY2026-27, which have been designated for planning, require from the agency a
complete program statement prepared in accordance with the Procedural Manual
for Capital Construction Projects as approved by the state building division of
the Department of Administrative Services. Projects directly related to program
continuation such as fire and life safety, maintenance, utility improvements,
handicapped access, and master planning require a statement of needs prepared
in accordance with the manual. An appropriation for drawings and construction
may be recommended only after submission of an acceptable program statement or
statement of needs on or before September 15 to the state building division,
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, and the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst.
Program statements that have been submitted prior to FY2025-26 shall be
-2-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
updated if necessary and resubmitted during the period July 1, 2025, to
September 1, 2025. Program statements that have been submitted prior to
FY2026-27 shall be updated if necessary and resubmitted during the period July
1, 2026, to September 1, 2026, by agency priority. Such priority shall be
subject to final modification by the governing authority of each agency on or
before September 15, 2026.
Sec. 13. It is the intent of the Legislature that agencies should
construct or renovate facilities in such a manner as to provide the greatest
cost-effective energy savings possible. Design criteria emphasizing efficiency,
functionality, and energy conservation shall be reflected in program
statements, schematic design documents, design development documents, and
construction documents. The state building division of the Department of
Administrative Services and the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment
shall provide technical assistance to the state agencies, upon request, to
assist them in providing for energy-efficient new or renovated facilities.
Sec. 14. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this agency for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 according to the
following program classifications:
No. 122 - Legislative Services
No. 123 - Clerk of the Legislature
No. 126 - Legislative Research
No. 127 - Revisor of Statutes
No. 129 - Legislative Audit
No. 501 - Intergovernmental Cooperation
No. 504 - Office of Public Counsel
No. 638 - Fiscal and Program Analysis
The budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services shall have the authority to transfer appropriations and
salary limits among the program classifications listed in this section as
directed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
Sec. 15. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 122 - Legislative Services
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 12,022,197 12,243,797
CASH FUND 95,000 95,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 39,270 39,270
PROGRAM TOTAL 12,156,467 12,378,067
SALARY LIMIT 10,080,000 10,510,430
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$75,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $75,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for the purpose of ongoing health-related research and
public policy development by the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature. Such funds may be used for, but shall not be limited to, hiring
temporary legal research assistance, consulting and research contracts,
reimbursement for necessary and appropriate expenses incurred in connection
with such research and policy development, and actual and necessary travel
reimbursement for task forces and committees established to conduct health
policy work.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 16. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 123 - Clerk of the Legislature
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 6,369,346 6,440,128
CASH FUND 150,200 150,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,519,546 6,590,128
SALARY LIMIT 5,396,132 5,590,061
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 17. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 126 - Legislative Research
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 924,004 924,004
PROGRAM TOTAL 924,004 924,004
SALARY LIMIT 845,222 879,272
-3-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 18. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 127 - Revisor of Statutes
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,885,954 1,885,954
CASH FUND 125,000 125,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,010,954 2,010,954
SALARY LIMIT 1,742,484 1,812,769
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 19. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 129 - Legislative Audit
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 882,654 882,654
PROGRAM TOTAL 882,654 882,654
SALARY LIMIT 798,495 830,662
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 20. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 501 - Intergovernmental Cooperation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 604,814 604,814
PROGRAM TOTAL 604,814 604,814
SALARY LIMIT -0- -0-
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 21. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 504 - Office of Public Counsel
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,202,116 2,202,116
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,202,116 2,202,116
SALARY LIMIT 1,994,497 2,070,009
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 22. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 638 - Fiscal and Program Analysis
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,985,573 1,897,991
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,985,573 1,897,991
SALARY LIMIT 1,753,974 1,736,546
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 23. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 52 - Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 48,948,491 50,516,419
CASH FUND est. 3,443,062 3,474,163
FEDERAL FUND est. 563,646 579,191
PROGRAM TOTAL 52,955,199 54,569,773
SALARY LIMIT 37,360,648 38,530,572
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
-4-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 34 - Court Administration
No. 40 - State Law Library
No. 396 - County Court System
No. 399 - District Court Reporters
No. 405 - Court of Appeals
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall
administratively transfer General Fund appropriations or Salary Limits or both
among Program Nos. 52, 67, 420, 434, 435, and 437 within Agency 5, upon written
certification by the State Court Administrator that the Supreme Court has
determined that such transfer is necessary for the efficient functioning of
statewide court operations and the proper administration of justice.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$270,000 General Funds and $270,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only
be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $270,000 General Funds and $270,000 Cash Funds for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$500,000 Cash Funds for parenting plan mediation for indigent and lower-income
persons involved in Parenting Act cases, as state aid, which shall only be used
for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $500,000 Cash Funds for parenting plan mediation for indigent and
lower-income persons involved in Parenting Act cases, as state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$550,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $550,000 General Funds to increase the
payments for interpreter services for deaf and hard of hearing persons and for
persons unable to communicate the English language, which shall only be used
for such purpose.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
Sec. 24. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 67 - Probation Services
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 36,169,481 37,441,498
CASH FUND est. 1,525,608 1,525,608
FEDERAL FUND est. 259,840 266,800
PROGRAM TOTAL 37,954,929 39,233,906
SALARY LIMIT 27,801,958 28,807,185
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 397 - Statewide Probation
No. 398 - Intensive Supervision Probation
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$50,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $50,000 General Funds to increase the
payments for interpreter services for deaf and hard of hearing persons and for
persons unable to communicate the English language, which shall only be used
for such purpose.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 25. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 235 - State Probation Contractual Services
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 1,018,469 1,028,820
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,018,469 1,028,820
SALARY LIMIT est. 162,289 167,398
Cash Fund expenditures from this program shall be restricted to the State
Probation Contractual Services Cash Fund.
The salary limitations for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
Sec. 26. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 420 - State Specialized Court Operations
-5-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 8,596,971 8,867,096
PROGRAM TOTAL 8,596,971 8,867,096
SALARY LIMIT 4,930,714 5,084,959
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
The supervision and management of the State Specialized Courts shall be
under the direct jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and the State Court
Administrator.
Sec. 27. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 434 - Office of Public Guardian
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 3,018,237 3,134,960
CASH FUND est. 36,000 36,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,054,237 3,170,960
SALARY LIMIT 2,523,385 2,591,817
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 28. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 435 - Probation Community Corrections
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 34,774,706 35,486,340
CASH FUND est. 6,625,800 6,625,800
PROGRAM TOTAL 41,400,506 42,112,140
SALARY LIMIT 14,910,259 15,236,134
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
Sec. 29. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 437 - Juvenile Justice
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 72,225,618 73,200,923
CASH FUND est. 25,000 25,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 148,500 148,500
PROGRAM TOTAL 72,399,118 73,374,423
SALARY LIMIT 18,063,140 18,622,614
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
There is included in the appropriation to this program $30,000 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 for the purpose of contracting for services with an
organization with the primary goal of ensuring sustainability in juvenile
justice reform. Such contract shall be used to explore making probation, the
district and state court systems, law enforcement, county attorneys, public
defenders, and school districts more effective partners in juvenile justice
reform. Any required funding greater than the amount provided in the contract
shall be acquired from other sources prior to entering into a contract for
services with the organization. The contract shall include requirements that
the organization work with a county having a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or more inhabitants willing to lease or grant county-owned property
for the purpose of creating a facility to address juvenile justice and
behavioral health issues and prioritize the development of a sustainable
revenue model for such facility.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
Sec. 30. AGENCY NO. 5 — SUPREME COURT
Program No. 570 - Court Automation
-6-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 5,093,271 5,093,271
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,093,271 5,093,271
SALARY LIMIT 559,538 559,538
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26 a
retainer fee of up to $841,616 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 a retainer fee of
up to $841,616 Cash Funds which shall be billed and paid in equal monthly
installments to the Intergovernmental Data Services Program Revolving Fund for
county automation expenses in lieu of standard central processing unit charges,
which shall only be used for such purpose. These retainer fee amounts shall not
include pass-through charges for leased computers and printers, software
maintenance costs, or county data conversion or interface costs. The annual
retainer fee for both FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 shall be paid prior to the end of
each respective fiscal year.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
Sec. 31. AGENCY NO. 7 — GOVERNOR
Program No. 17 - Governor Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,060,029 2,060,029
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,060,029 2,060,029
SALARY LIMIT 1,680,069 1,732,954
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this agency for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 according to the
following program classifications:
No. 18 - Governor's Policy Research Office
No. 21 - Office of the Governor
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 32. AGENCY NO. 8 — LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
Program No. 124 - Office of the Lieutenant Governor
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 40,739 40,739
PROGRAM TOTAL 40,739 40,739
SALARY LIMIT 14,848 15,316
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 33. AGENCY NO. 9 — SECRETARY OF STATE
Program No. 20 - Services and Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 5,022,646 4,715,747
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,022,646 4,715,747
SALARY LIMIT 2,235,590 2,296,518
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 22 - Departmental Administration
No. 51 - Enforcement of Standards - Corporations
No. 53 - Enforcement of Standards - Collection Agencies
No. 89 - Uniform Commercial Code Central Filing
Sec. 34. AGENCY NO. 9 — SECRETARY OF STATE
Program No. 45 - Election Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,888,158 2,942,359
CASH FUND 175,000 175,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 1,239,818 1,239,818
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,302,976 4,357,177
SALARY LIMIT 892,691 920,790
-7-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Sec. 35. AGENCY NO. 9 — SECRETARY OF STATE
Program No. 86 - Records Management
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 198,169 206,615
CASH FUND 4,304,389 4,321,818
REVOLVING FUND 1,039,142 1,049,637
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,541,700 5,578,070
SALARY LIMIT 750,776 774,407
Sec. 36. AGENCY NO. 10 — AUDITOR OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS
Program No. 506 - State Agency and County Post Audits
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 4,351,565 4,780,369
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,351,565 4,780,369
SALARY LIMIT 3,254,766 3,615,098
Sec. 37. AGENCY NO. 10 — AUDITOR OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS
Program No. 525 - Cooperative Audits
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 2,863,287 2,940,900
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,863,287 2,940,900
SALARY LIMIT 2,252,282 2,323,177
Sec. 38. AGENCY NO. 11 — ATTORNEY GENERAL
Program No. 290 - State Settlement Funds
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 4,829,133 4,931,839
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,829,133 4,931,839
SALARY LIMIT 2,244,095 2,314,734
Sec. 39. AGENCY NO. 11 — ATTORNEY GENERAL
Program No. 496 - Interstate Water Litigation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 300,000 300,000
CASH FUND 200,000 200,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 500,000 500,000
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated.
The salary limit for this program shall be limited to the amount of the
reappropriation.
Sec. 40. AGENCY NO. 11 — ATTORNEY GENERAL
Program No. 507 - Interpretation and Application of Law
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 8,456,748 8,699,405
CASH FUND 3,059,723 3,090,194
FEDERAL FUND est. 1,917,370 1,961,254
REVOLVING FUND est. 2,165,109 2,237,497
PROGRAM TOTAL 15,598,950 15,988,350
SALARY LIMIT 10,410,372 10,697,417
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
-8-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
No. 270 - Administration
No. 271 - Civil Bureau
No. 272 - Criminal Bureau
No. 273 - Legal Services Bureau
No. 274 - Public Protection Bureau
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$845,807 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $845,807 Cash Funds, which appropriations
shall only be expended directly from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund from
budget subprogram 4 for purposes of enforcing the tobacco settlement agreement.
Revolving Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown.
Sec. 41. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 24 - State Disbursement Unit
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,116,802 1,116,802
CASH FUND 43,264 43,264
FEDERAL FUND est. 1,842,169 1,842,169
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,002,235 3,002,235
SALARY LIMIT 1,671,363 1,726,740
Sec. 42. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 117 - Mutual Finance Assistance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 8,060,000 8,060,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 8,060,000 8,060,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$8,060,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $8,060,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 43. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 470 - Inland Port Authority
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 25,000,000 25,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 25,000,000 25,000,000
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 44. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 475 - ABLE Savings Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 467,654 479,006
PROGRAM TOTAL 467,654 479,006
SALARY LIMIT 214,465 221,216
Sec. 45. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 503 - Treasury Management
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 987,459 1,015,206
PROGRAM TOTAL 987,459 1,015,206
SALARY LIMIT 690,074 711,797
Sec. 46. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 505 - Educational Savings Unit
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 837,396 849,660
PROGRAM TOTAL 837,396 849,660
SALARY LIMIT 299,340 308,762
Sec. 47. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 512 - Unclaimed Property
-9-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,480,344 1,524,172
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,480,344 1,524,172
SALARY LIMIT 713,616 736,080
Sec. 48. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 663 - Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 4,500,000 4,500,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,500,000 4,500,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$4,500,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $4,500,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the amount
shown.
Sec. 49. AGENCY NO. 12 — STATE TREASURER
Program No. 665 - Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 7,100,000 7,100,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 7,100,000 7,100,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,100,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $7,100,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the amount
shown.
Sec. 50. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and
per diems for the State Department of Education may be exceeded by the amount
required to fulfill the state's obligation for salaries in contractual
arrangements in which the state has entered into an employee-employer
relationship with the person subject to the contract as determined by the
social security administration bureau of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 51. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 25 - Education, Administration, and Support
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 29,391,615 29,920,599
CASH FUND 4,281,052 4,090,328
FEDERAL FUND est. 44,964,832 45,673,982
REVOLVING FUND 2,137,568 2,168,734
PROGRAM TOTAL 80,775,067 81,853,643
SALARY LIMIT 22,710,585 23,426,743
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 25 - Commissioner's Office
No. 403 - General Counsel and Legal Services
No. 440 - Human Resources
No. 441 - Teaching, Learning, and Assessment
No. 442 - Public Information and Communications
No. 443 - Technology Services
No. 444 - Early Childhood
No. 445 - Data Management and Application Development
No. 446 - Career and Adult Education
No. 447 - Accreditation, Certification, and Approval
No. 448 - Special Education
No. 449 - ESEA Programs
No. 450 - Student Support and Services
No. 451 - Finance and Administrative Services
No. 452 - Budget and Grants Management
No. 453 - Information Systems and Services
No. 454 - School and District Support
-10-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$5,000,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$5,000,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $5,000,000
General Funds for FY2025-26 and $5,000,000 General Funds for FY2026-27 for
student loan forgiveness.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,149,939 General Funds for statewide assessment and reporting, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $7,149,939 General Funds for statewide assessment and
reporting, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$10,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $10,000 General Funds for the
Educational Opportunity for Military Children Program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$300,000 General Funds for the Nebraska Technology Initiative, which shall only
be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $300,000 General Funds for the Nebraska Technology
Initiative, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$306,960 Cash Funds to be used for administrative purposes related to the state
aid for career and technical education. There is included in the appropriation
to this program for FY2026-27 $306,960 Cash Funds to be used for administrative
purposes related to the state aid for career and technical education.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$50,000 Cash Funds to be used for administrative purposes related to the
additional state aid for career education student organizations. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $50,000 Cash Funds
to be used for administrative purposes related to the additional state aid for
career education student organizations.
Sec. 52. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 158 - Education Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,303,294,141 1,291,572,774
CASH FUND 423,994,794 442,512,508
FEDERAL FUND est. 363,873,542 363,873,542
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,091,162,477 2,097,958,824
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,303,294,141 General Funds, $423,994,794 Cash Funds, and $363,873,542 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,291,572,774
General Funds, $442,512,508 Cash Funds, and $363,873,542 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown for FY2025-26 $1,036,453,304 General
Funds which are hereby appropriated to provide state aid to public school
districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
There is included in the amount shown for FY2026-27 $1,024,467,449 General
Funds which are hereby appropriated to provide state aid to public school
districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
There is included in the amount shown for FY2025-26 $112,977,519 Cash
Funds which are hereby appropriated to provide twenty-four percent of
foundation aid to public school districts pursuant to the Tax Equity and
Educational Opportunities Support Act. There is included in the amount shown
for FY2026-27 $113,571,200 Cash Funds which are hereby appropriated to provide
twenty-four percent of foundation aid to public school districts pursuant to
the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $235,724,424
General Funds and $291,390,830 Cash Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26
for special education reimbursement. There is included in the amount shown for
this program $235,724,424 General Funds and $309,839,863 Cash Funds provided as
state aid for FY2026-27 for special education reimbursement.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $1,465,500 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $1,465,500 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 to carry out the provisions of subsection (2) of
section 79-734.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $9,632,419 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $9,896,907 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for core services for educational service units.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $3,170,927 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $3,170,927 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for technology infrastructure for educational
service units.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $281,654 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $281,654 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for distance education aid to educational service
-11-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
units.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $1,851,467 Cash
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $1,851,467 Cash Funds provided as
state aid for FY2026-27 for educational service units to provide regional
coaches and job-embedded training relating to evidence-based reading
instruction.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $617,898 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $617,898 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for the school breakfast program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $392,032 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $392,032 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for the school lunch program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $90,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $90,000 General Funds provided as
state aid for FY2026-27 for the Summer Food Service Program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $214,664 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $214,664 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for adult basic education programs.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $750,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $750,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for aid to institutions offering high school
equivalency programs.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $3,619,357 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $3,619,357 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for early childhood education projects.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $7,500,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $7,500,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for the Early Childhood Education Grant Program for
at-risk children from birth to age three. It is the intent of the Legislature
that a maximum of five percent of General Funds appropriated each fiscal year
for the Early Childhood Education Grant Program for at-risk children from birth
to age three may be used for evaluation and technical assistance.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $100,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $100,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for scholarships for early childhood education
providers.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $69,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $69,000 General Funds provided as
state aid for FY2026-27 for incentive bonuses for providers of child care and
early childhood education programs.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $400,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $400,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for the Nurturing Healthy Behaviors program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $470,000 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $470,000 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for learning community aid.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $2,342,962 General
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $2,342,962 General Funds provided
as state aid for FY2026-27 for programs for learners with high ability.
There is included in the amount shown for this program for FY2025-26
$4,809,040 Cash Funds provided as state aid for career and technical education,
to be distributed between secondary and postsecondary schools according to the
formula used for federal Perkins funds as such formula existed on January 1,
2025. Each school district shall receive no less than $7,500. There is included
in the amount shown for this program for FY2026-27 $4,809,040 Cash Funds
provided as state aid for career and technical education, to be distributed
between secondary and postsecondary schools according to the formula used for
federal Perkins funds as such formula existed on January 1, 2025. Each school
district shall receive no less than $7,500.
There is included in the amount shown for this program for FY2025-26
$150,000 Cash Funds provided as state aid, to be evenly distributed between the
career education student organizations. There is included in the amount shown
for this program for FY2026-27 $150,000 Cash Funds provided as state aid, to be
evenly distributed between the career education student organizations.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $1,000,000 Cash
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $1,000,000 Cash Funds provided as
state aid for FY2026-27 for the Nebraska Teacher Apprenticeship Program.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $2,500,000 Cash
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $2,500,000 Cash Funds provided as
state aid for FY2026-27 for the Extraordinary Increase in Special Education
Expenditures Act.
There is included in the amount shown for this program $5,000,000 Cash
Funds provided as state aid for FY2025-26 and $5,000,000 Cash Funds provided as
state aid for FY2026-27 for the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act.
Sec. 53. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 161 - Education Innovation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 11,122,316 11,132,992
PROGRAM TOTAL 11,122,316 11,132,992
-12-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
SALARY LIMIT 168,722 174,032
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$10,807,362 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$10,807,362 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 54. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 351 - Vocational Rehabilitation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 6,561,850 6,724,525
CASH FUND 557,883 571,719
FEDERAL FUND est. 30,807,902 31,596,542
PROGRAM TOTAL 37,927,635 38,892,786
SALARY LIMIT 15,709,139 16,203,613
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$49,289 General Funds and $8,560,706 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $49,289 General Funds and
$8,560,706 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Division of Rehabilitation
Services of the State Department of Education and the Division of Developmental
Disabilities of the Department of Health and Human Services work
collaboratively to focus on employment for individuals with disabilities and to
maximize federal matching funds in compliance with the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act and the federal Home and Community-Based
Services Final Rule.
Sec. 55. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 352 - Disability Determination
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
FEDERAL FUND est. 16,449,636 16,860,236
PROGRAM TOTAL 16,449,636 16,860,236
SALARY LIMIT 5,891,365 6,075,433
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$3,697,373 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $3,697,373 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Sec. 56. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 401 - Services for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,073,024 2,075,104
CASH FUND 2,984 2,988
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,076,008 2,078,092
SALARY LIMIT 56,342 58,116
Sec. 57. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 402 - Nebraska Center for the Education of Children who are
Blind or Visually Impaired
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,726,405 2,727,104
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,726,405 2,727,104
SALARY LIMIT 18,894 19,489
Sec. 58. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 16 - Expenses, Constitutional Officers
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 61,807 61,807
-13-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
PROGRAM TOTAL 61,807 61,807
Sec. 59. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 19 - Modular Housing Units Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 774,074 804,156
PROGRAM TOTAL 774,074 804,156
SALARY LIMIT 445,888 461,884
Sec. 60. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 54 - Enforcement of Standards - Common Carriers
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,739,104 1,797,342
CASH FUND 77,976 80,952
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,817,080 1,878,294
SALARY LIMIT 1,158,111 1,190,388
Sec. 61. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 60 - Grain Warehouse Surveillance/Moisture Testing
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 352,611 363,852
PROGRAM TOTAL 352,611 363,852
SALARY LIMIT 224,610 231,481
Sec. 62. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 64 - Nebraska Telecommunications Relay System Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,548,793 1,556,611
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,548,793 1,556,611
SALARY LIMIT 128,991 132,985
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$180,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $180,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 63. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 583 - Enhanced Wireless 911 Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 15,676,242 15,744,729
PROGRAM TOTAL 15,676,242 15,744,729
SALARY LIMIT 1,113,379 1,149,626
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$8,500,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $8,500,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 64. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 686 - Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 85,793,019 85,856,075
PROGRAM TOTAL 85,793,019 85,856,075
SALARY LIMIT 1,017,434 1,049,459
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$84,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$84,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 65. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 790 - Natural Gas Regulation
-14-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,817,247 1,837,334
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,817,247 1,837,334
SALARY LIMIT 359,427 370,741
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$185,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $185,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 66. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 792 - Major Oil Pipeline Siting
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 6,752,241 6,755,440
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,752,241 6,755,440
SALARY LIMIT 176,309 176,309
Sec. 67. AGENCY NO. 14 — PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Program No. 793 - Broadband Bridge
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 323,895 161,948
PROGRAM TOTAL 323,895 161,948
SALARY LIMIT 213,204 106,602
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, less $1,800,000, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 68. AGENCY NO. 15 — BOARD OF PARDONS AND BOARD OF PAROLE
Program No. 358 - Board of Parole
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 911,233 928,548
PROGRAM TOTAL 911,233 928,548
SALARY LIMIT 315,311 325,237
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 69. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 102 - Revenue Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 30,877,988 31,484,996
CASH FUND 2,953,216 3,061,547
PROGRAM TOTAL 33,831,204 34,546,543
SALARY LIMIT 20,928,517 21,590,310
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$336,404 Cash Funds for staff necessary to audit and enforce provisions of the
tobacco Master Settlement Agreement from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $336,404
Cash Funds for staff necessary to audit and enforce provisions of the tobacco
Master Settlement Agreement from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
Sec. 70. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 108 - Homestead Exemption
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 159,917,000 170,303,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 159,917,000 170,303,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$159,917,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$170,303,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 71. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 111 - Motor Fuels
-15-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,798,432 1,843,368
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,798,432 1,843,368
SALARY LIMIT 1,301,570 1,329,082
Sec. 72. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 112 - Property Assessment
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,055,273 2,127,199
CASH FUND 787,265 801,196
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,842,538 2,928,395
SALARY LIMIT 2,065,163 2,117,002
Sec. 73. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 121 - School Property Tax Credit
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 780,000,000 808,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 780,000,000 808,000,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$780,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$808,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 74. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 132 - Property Tax Credit Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 464,000,000 490,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 464,000,000 490,000,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$464,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$490,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 75. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 160 - Lottery Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 22,853,327 23,292,807
PROGRAM TOTAL 22,853,327 23,292,807
SALARY LIMIT 1,836,936 1,887,127
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown. It is the
intent of the Legislature that all expenses of the lottery, both external and
internal, be recorded in the appropriate Cash Fund unless specifically required
by statute to be recorded elsewhere.
Sec. 76. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 164 - Gamblers Assistance Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 3,208,877 3,217,273
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,208,877 3,217,273
SALARY LIMIT 149,532 154,334
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,150,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,150,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 77. AGENCY NO. 16 — DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
Program No. 165 - Charitable Gaming
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-16-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
GENERAL FUND 141,870 -0-
CASH FUND 2,815,195 3,028,227
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,957,065 3,028,227
SALARY LIMIT 1,888,330 1,924,671
Sec. 78. AGENCY NO. 18 — DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Program No. 78 - Department of Agriculture
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 6,612,621 6,612,621
CASH FUND 10,404,992 10,856,871
FEDERAL FUND est. 4,648,359 4,711,663
REVOLVING FUND 447,306 454,347
PROGRAM TOTAL 22,113,278 22,635,502
SALARY LIMIT 9,432,803 9,754,862
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 27 - Shared Services
No. 57 - Food Safety and Consumer Protection
No. 63 - Animal and Plant Health Protection
No. 564 - Ag Promotion and Development
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$653,000 General Funds and $420,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $653,000 General Funds and $420,000 Federal Funds
estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $300,000
General Funds for FY2025-26 and $300,000 General Funds for FY2026-27, for
purposes of purchasing assistive technology and equipment for farmers and
ranchers pursuant to the Nebraska AgrAbility program which does not otherwise
qualify for funding by the United States Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 79. AGENCY NO. 19 — DEPARTMENT OF BANKING AND FINANCE
Program No. 65 - Enforcement of Standards - Financial Institutions
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 7,993,666 7,993,666
PROGRAM TOTAL 7,993,666 7,993,666
SALARY LIMIT 5,514,668 5,514,668
Sec. 80. AGENCY NO. 19 — DEPARTMENT OF BANKING AND FINANCE
Program No. 66 - Enforcement of Standards - Securities
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,950,792 1,950,792
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,950,792 1,950,792
SALARY LIMIT 1,124,953 1,124,953
Sec. 81. AGENCY NO. 21 — STATE FIRE MARSHAL
Program No. 193 - Public Protection
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 4,009,665 3,472,106
CASH FUND 5,095,668 5,880,040
FEDERAL FUND est. 546,761 560,989
PROGRAM TOTAL 9,652,094 9,913,135
SALARY LIMIT 4,882,448 5,036,732
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 225 - General Operations
-17-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
No. 226 - Pipeline Safety
No. 227 - Underground Storage Tanks
No. 229 - Cigarette Ignition Propensity Testing
No. 230 - Safety Inspection Program
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$55,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$55,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. If federal restrictions prevent using these Federal Funds for state
aid, the State Fire Marshal may reallocate available funds in the Underground
Storage Tank Fund to provide state aid payments to the affected political
subdivisions.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$20,000 Cash Funds for fireworks testing, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$20,000 Cash Funds for fireworks testing, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 82. AGENCY NO. 21 — STATE FIRE MARSHAL
Program No. 340 - Training Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,079,729 1,091,454
CASH FUND 1,215,928 1,228,887
FEDERAL FUND est. 157,466 157,466
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,453,123 2,477,807
SALARY LIMIT 672,889 678,709
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,125,000 Cash Funds from the Training Division Cash Fund to connect first
responders to behavioral health services, supports, and training and for a
statewide wellness learning plan that includes anonymous assessments,
education, and awareness to promote resiliency development. There is included
in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,125,000 Cash Funds from
the Training Division Cash Fund to connect first responders to behavioral
health services, supports, and training and for a statewide wellness learning
plan that includes anonymous assessments, education, and awareness to promote
resiliency development.
Sec. 83. AGENCY NO. 21 — STATE FIRE MARSHAL
Program No. 845 - Nebraska Public Safety Communication System
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 130,326 143,670
CASH FUND 71,734 71,734
PROGRAM TOTAL 202,060 215,404
Sec. 84. AGENCY NO. 22 — DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE
Program No. 68 - Medical Professional Liability
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 137,423 137,423
PROGRAM TOTAL 137,423 137,423
SALARY LIMIT 69,778 69,778
Sec. 85. AGENCY NO. 22 — DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE
Program No. 69 - Enforcement of Standards - Insurance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 13,123,063 13,123,063
FEDERAL FUND est. 1,457,703 1,457,703
PROGRAM TOTAL 14,580,766 14,580,766
SALARY LIMIT 9,510,470 9,510,470
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$664,722 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $664,722 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Sec. 86. AGENCY NO. 22 — DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE
Program No. 556 - Liquidation of Insurance Companies
-18-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 5,000 5,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,000 5,000
Sec. 87. AGENCY NO. 23 — DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
Program No. 31 - Division of Employment
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 13,082,081 13,104,750
FEDERAL FUND est. 48,800,427 49,608,896
PROGRAM TOTAL 61,882,508 62,713,646
SALARY LIMIT 23,368,597 23,873,143
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$9,883,387 Cash Funds for state aid for workforce development, which shall only
be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $9,880,259 Cash Funds for state aid for workforce
development, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$116,613 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $119,741 Cash Funds for the
administration of the workforce development program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,600,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,600,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,904,743 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $7,904,743 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program Federal Funds made
available to the state under section 903(d) and 903(f) of the federal Social
Security Act, as amended, in the amount of $2,500,000 in FY2025-26 and
$2,500,000 in FY2026-27, or so much thereof as may be necessary, to be used for
the administration of the Employment Security Law and public employment
offices, including the administration of one-stop career centers to the extent
authorized under the federal Social Security Act and the Wagner-Peyser Act and
the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. The expenditure or other
disposition of section 903(d) and 903(f) money appropriated in this section
shall be accounted for in accordance with standards established by the United
States Secretary of Labor. Except as provided in this section, all provisions
of subsection (2) of section 48-621 except subdivision (2)(a)(i) shall apply to
this appropriation.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance for workforce development
existing on June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 88. AGENCY NO. 23 — DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
Program No. 194 - Division for Protection of People and Property
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 764,157 779,383
CASH FUND 687,811 709,750
FEDERAL FUND est. 822,851 828,634
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,274,819 2,317,767
SALARY LIMIT 1,315,258 1,346,619
Sec. 89. AGENCY NO. 24 — DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
Program No. 70 - Enforcement of Standards - Motor Vehicles/Motor Vehicle
Drivers
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 54,359,753 44,484,204
FEDERAL FUND est. 48,446 48,446
PROGRAM TOTAL 54,408,199 44,532,650
SALARY LIMIT 13,166,753 13,572,036
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$68,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $68,000
-19-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
up to $8,000,000 is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 90. AGENCY NO. 24 — DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
Program No. 90 - Motor Vehicle License Plates
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 4,361,698 3,143,114
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,361,698 3,143,114
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amounts shown.
Sec. 91. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 30 - Tobacco Prevention and Control
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 2,570,000 2,570,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 9,000 9,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,579,000 2,579,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$2,570,000 Cash Funds for tobacco use prevention and control from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund. There is included in the appropriation to this program
for FY2026-27 $2,570,000 Cash Funds for tobacco use prevention and control from
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
Sec. 92. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 33 - Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 199,883,223 209,301,896
CASH FUND 50,920,649 51,381,168
FEDERAL FUND est. 388,915,714 396,576,679
PROGRAM TOTAL 639,719,586 657,259,743
SALARY LIMIT 230,680,891 237,531,342
(1) The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the
appropriations and expenditures for this program according to the following
program classifications:
No. 261 - General Operations
No. 262 - Public Health Administration
No. 263 - Medicaid and Long-Term Care Administration
No. 265 - Protection and Safety
No. 266 - Economic and Family Support
No. 268 - Behavioral Health Administration
No. 269 - Developmental Disabilities Administration
(2) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$13,688 Cash Funds for regulatory support for out-of-hospital emergency care
providers licensing from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund. There is included
in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $13,688 Cash Funds for
regulatory support for out-of-hospital emergency care providers licensing from
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
(3) There is included in the appropriation to this program $404,643 Cash
Funds for FY2025-26 and $404,643 Cash Funds for FY2026-27 from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for respite services in each of the service areas
designated by the Department of Health and Human Services and for
administrative costs, including personnel costs, associated with the Nebraska
Lifespan Respite Services Program.
(4) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$6,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for costs of smoking
cessation covered by medicaid. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $6,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund
for costs of smoking cessation covered by medicaid.
(5) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$220,000 Cash Funds to operate a satellite office of minority health in the
second and third congressional districts to coordinate and administer state
policy relating to minority health from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $220,000
Cash Funds to operate a satellite office of minority health in the second and
third congressional districts to coordinate and administer state policy
relating to minority health from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
(6) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$100,000 Cash Funds for staff and operating expenses for public health from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $100,000 Cash Funds for staff and operating expenses for
public health from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
-20-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Sec. 93. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 38 - Behavioral Health Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 70,132,211 70,132,211
CASH FUND 23,919,851 23,419,851
FEDERAL FUND est. 10,504,971 10,504,971
PROGRAM TOTAL 104,557,033 104,057,033
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$70,132,211 General Funds, $23,919,851 Cash Funds, and $10,504,971 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $70,132,211
General Funds, $23,419,851 Cash Funds, and $10,504,971 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $6,500,000
Cash Funds for FY2025-26 and $6,500,000 Cash Funds for FY2026-27 from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to be used for community-based mental health and
substance abuse services, including intermediate-level residential mental
health services. It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds shall be
distributed to each of the six behavioral health regions based upon a formula
determined by the Department of Health and Human Services.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $1,500,000
Cash Funds for FY2025-26 and $1,500,000 Cash Funds for FY2026-27 from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to be used for the cost of maintenance and
treatment of persons in emergency protective custody under the Nebraska Mental
Health Commitment Act.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $500,000
Cash Funds for FY2025-26 from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to be used for
a grant to a nonprofit entity for construction costs related to a new facility.
To be eligible for the grant, the nonprofit entity shall provide behavioral
health services for youth in a facility, early childhood education, behavioral
and mental health services for youth and caregivers, and access to an outdoor
nature classroom. The nonprofit entity shall provide verification that the new
facility for which the grant will be used is located in a qualified census
district in a city of the metropolitan class and verification of matching funds
equal to two dollars of private funds for every one dollar of state funds.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $3,000,000 from the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Cash Fund for
disbursement by the Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health
and Human Services to regional behavioral health authorities for behavioral
health regions established pursuant to section 71-807 for opioid prevention and
harm reduction under the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act. There is included
in the amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $3,000,000 from the
Opioid Prevention and Treatment Cash Fund for disbursement by the Division of
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services to regional
behavioral health authorities for behavioral health regions established
pursuant to section 71-807 for opioid prevention and harm reduction under the
Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $500,000 General Funds for state aid disbursed to local public health
departments as provided in section 71-1628.08 for opioid use prevention and
opioid remediation under the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the amount shown as aid for
this program for FY2026-27 $500,000 General Funds for state aid disbursed to
local public health departments as provided in section 71-1628.08 for opioid
use prevention and opioid remediation under the Opioid Prevention and Treatment
Act, which shall only be used for such purpose.
It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation to the
Department of Health and Human Services for behavioral health aid and
designated as funding to be allocated to a behavioral health region shall be
utilized to provide activities pursuant to the approved annual budget of the
behavioral health region or additional activities identified through need
demonstrated by the region throughout the year.
Whenever circumstances occur during the budget year that impact the
initial projected behavioral health region budget, the behavioral health
regional governing board may request a reassignment of funds to accommodate
emerging needs identified by the behavioral health region to maximize the
ability of the region to implement new behavioral health services and supports
or expand capacity in existing services. The Division of Behavioral Health
shall approve all such requests which comply with all state and federal
requirements. The Division of Behavioral Health shall approve or deny such
requests in writing within thirty days.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 94. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 175 - Rural Health Provider Incentive Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-21-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
GENERAL FUND 2,180,723 2,180,723
CASH FUND 3,906,815 3,906,815
FEDERAL FUND est. 450,000 450,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,537,538 6,537,538
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$2,180,723 General Funds, $3,906,815 Cash Funds, and $450,000 Federal Funds
estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $2,180,723 General
Funds, $3,906,815 Cash Funds, and $450,000 Federal Funds estimate for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 95. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 176 - Nursing Incentives
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 20,000 20,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 20,000 20,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$20,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $20,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 96. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 178 - Professional Licensure
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 60,028 61,762
CASH FUND 12,444,346 12,596,550
PROGRAM TOTAL 12,504,374 12,658,312
SALARY LIMIT 4,220,218 4,328,552
Sec. 97. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 250 - Juvenile Services Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 30,763,398 31,781,782
CASH FUND 1,331,322 1,361,908
FEDERAL FUND est. 922,415 917,860
PROGRAM TOTAL 33,017,135 34,061,550
SALARY LIMIT 20,402,439 21,185,775
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 315 - Office of Juvenile Services
No. 371 - Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Hastings
No. 374 - Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Kearney
No. 457 - Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Lincoln
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,000,000 Cash Funds for mental health services to juvenile offenders under
section 43-407 from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund. There is included in
the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,000,000 Cash Funds for
mental health services to juvenile offenders under section 43-407 from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
Sec. 98. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 344 - Children's Health Insurance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 29,952,083 29,989,393
CASH FUND 10,085,700 10,085,700
FEDERAL FUND est. 105,921,341 106,010,290
PROGRAM TOTAL 145,959,124 146,085,383
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$29,952,083 General Funds, $10,085,700 Cash Funds, and $105,921,341 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
-22-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $29,989,393
General Funds, $10,085,700 Cash Funds, and $106,010,290 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$6,835,700 Cash Funds for state aid from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $6,835,700
Cash Funds for state aid from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 up to $250,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 up to $250,000 Cash Funds
from the Health and Human Services Cash Fund for the state match for
utilization of the unused administrative cap as allowed under the Children's
Health Insurance Program for payments to the Nebraska Regional Poison Center
funded through the University of Nebraska Medical Center. The match is from
Cash Funds transferred from the University of Nebraska Medical Center.
It is the intent of the Legislature that phased-down state contributions
to the federal government as defined and required by the federal Medicare
Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 may be made from
appropriations to this program.
Sec. 99. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 347 - Public Assistance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 76,380,054 76,380,054
CASH FUND 5,360,000 5,360,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 242,207,325 232,207,325
PROGRAM TOTAL 323,947,379 313,947,379
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$76,380,054 General Funds, $5,360,000 Cash Funds, and $242,207,325 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $76,380,054
General Funds, $5,360,000 Cash Funds, and $232,207,325 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $810,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to aid in
carrying out the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program and to provide
payment to caregivers to purchase services under the respite subsidy program.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27
$810,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to aid in carrying
out the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program and to provide payment to
caregivers to purchase services under the respite subsidy program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$10,000,000 federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families funds for grants to
nonprofit organizations holding a certificate of exemption under section 501(c)
(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that distributes food in ten or more counties
in Nebraska and qualifies for the Emergency Food Assistance Program
administered by the United States Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 100. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 348 - Medical Assistance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,083,193,393 1,078,129,645
CASH FUND 740,689,274 727,780,910
FEDERAL FUND est. 3,886,655,047 3,851,304,333
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,710,537,714 5,657,214,888
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classification:
No. 348 - Medical Assistance
No. 349 - Medicaid Expansion Aid
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,083,193,393 General Funds, $740,689,274 Cash Funds, and $3,886,655,047
Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$1,078,129,645 General Funds, $727,780,910 Cash Funds, and $3,851,304,333
Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $450,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for a
state plan amendment covering tobacco-use cessation in compliance with Title
XIX of the federal Social Security Act. There is included in the amount shown
as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $450,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for a state plan amendment covering tobacco-use cessation
in compliance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. The smoking
cessation funding for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 is for the costs of tobacco-use
-23-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
cessation counseling and tobacco-use cessation pharmaceuticals approved by the
federal Food and Drug Administration for such purpose.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the total amount appropriated for
medicaid nursing facility rates for Program No. 348, specified as $449,351,518
for FY2025-26 ($196,186,873 General Funds and $253,164,645 Federal Funds) and
$449,351,518 for FY2026-27 ($199,467,139 General Funds and $249,884,379 Federal
Funds), shall be used in the medicaid nursing facility rate calculation for
Program No. 348, including the calculation of the annual inflation factor.
The total amount appropriated for medicaid nursing facility rates for
Program No. 348 includes amounts for rate enhancement and any other purpose
related to medicaid nursing facility services. The Department of Health and
Human Services shall file a report electronically with the Legislative Fiscal
Analyst and the Clerk of the Legislature no later than August 1, 2025, on how
the inflation factor was calculated for FY2025-26 rates and no later than
August 1, 2026, on how the inflation factor was calculated for FY2026-27 rates.
The Department of Health and Human Services shall file a report
electronically with the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk of the
Legislature between December 15 and December 31 of each year of the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, identifying the amount of any unspent remaining
appropriation from the prior fiscal year's appropriations earmarked for nursing
facility payments. The report shall include an identification of encumbrances
and retroactive payments.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $1,500,000
Cash Funds for FY2025-26 from the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access
Assessment Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services for the medical
assistance program to provide reimbursement to mental health providers who do
not practice in a hospital and who provide services to medicaid-eligible
participants who are eligible for both medicaid and medicare, if there is a
lower rate paid under medicare compared to rates paid at the time for medicaid
rates for behavioral health services. It is the intent of the Legislature to
sustain the medicaid rates for mental health providers serving medicaid-
eligible participants who are eligible for both medicaid and medicare and are
receiving behavioral health services under Program No. 348, Medical Assistance.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $1,408,364
Cash Funds for FY2025-26 from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund for
medicaid assisted-living facility rates for Program No. 348, to be used
specifically by the Department of Health and Human Services to increase the
current medicaid assisted-living facility rates, which are included in Program
No. 348 and paid as a service as part of Nebraska's aged and disabled home and
community-based medicaid 1915(c) waiver program, to the daily rate of $73.91
for FY2025-26, for both rural and urban assisted-living single occupancy waiver
days.
It is the intent of the Legislature that phased-down state contributions
to the federal government as defined and required by the federal Medicare
Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 may be made from
appropriations to this program.
The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services
may certify to the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 unexpended
appropriation balances for Medical Assistance, Program No. 348, available to
transfer to Developmental Disability Aid, Program No. 424, to be used only to
maintain individuals with an intellectual or developmental disability in a
medicaid program that best serves their needs at a cost that does not exceed
the cost of services provided in an institution. The budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall
administratively transfer during FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 available
appropriations as certified by the chief executive officer of the Department of
Health and Human Services from Medical Assistance, Program No. 348, to
Developmental Disability Aid, Program No. 424.
Sec. 101. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 350 - Child Abuse Prevention
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 600,000 600,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 600,000 600,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$598,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $598,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 102. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 354 - Child Welfare Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 182,756,746 182,756,746
CASH FUND 3,000,000 3,000,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 67,996,793 67,996,793
-24-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
PROGRAM TOTAL 253,753,539 253,753,539
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$182,756,746 General Funds, $3,000,000 Cash Funds, and $67,996,793 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $182,756,746
General Funds, $3,000,000 Cash Funds, and $67,996,793 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $7,500,000 federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families funds for
child advocacy centers. There is included in the amount shown as aid for this
program for FY2026-27 $7,500,000 federal Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families funds for child advocacy centers. It is the intent of the Legislature
to continue such appropriations in future years.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $500,000 for
FY2025-26 from federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families funds and
$500,000 for FY2026-27 from federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
funds for coordination activities of the state chapter of child advocacy
centers as defined in 34 U.S.C. 20302, as such section existed on January 1,
2023. The coordination activities include, but are not limited to, development
of a distribution formula for the funding provided in this section for child
advocacy centers, data collection and analysis required for reports to the
federal Administration for Children and Families, accounting of the fund
expenditures per state and federal requirements, and preparing the annual
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families report for funds appropriated by the
Legislature. The report shall be filed with the Department of Health and Human
Services on a date specified by the department. It is the intent of the
Legislature to continue such appropriations in future years.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$500,000 federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families funds for court
appointed special advocate aid. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $500,000 federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
funds for court appointed special advocate aid.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $3,000,000 Cash Funds from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit
Fund for domestic violence services. There is included in the amount show as
aid for this program for FY2026-27 $3,000,000 Cash Funds from the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund for domestic violence services.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, up to $10,000,000, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 103. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 359 - Bridge to Independence
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,601,269 2,605,125
FEDERAL FUND est. 2,180,211 2,196,664
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,781,480 4,801,789
SALARY LIMIT 1,293,209 1,307,864
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,281,202 General Funds and $993,452 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,281,202 General Funds and
$993,452 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
Sec. 104. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 365 - Mental Health Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 87,441,738 92,312,936
CASH FUND 4,526,221 4,539,020
FEDERAL FUND est. 5,162,317 5,161,538
PROGRAM TOTAL 97,130,276 102,013,494
SALARY LIMIT 58,602,266 61,205,019
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 363 - Lincoln Regional Center
No. 456 - Whitehall Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility
No. 870 - Norfolk Sex Offender Treatment
Sec. 105. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 421 - Beatrice State Developmental Center
-25-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 14,367,734 14,652,858
CASH FUND 2,733,914 2,718,701
FEDERAL FUND est. 26,268,151 26,768,449
PROGRAM TOTAL 43,369,799 44,140,008
SALARY LIMIT 28,374,304 28,870,800
The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services
shall certify to the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services the FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 unexpended
appropriation balances for the Beatrice State Developmental Center, Program
421, which are available to transition and maintain persons transferred from
the Beatrice State Developmental Center to community-based developmental
disability or other services. The budget administrator of the budget division
of the Department of Administrative Services shall administratively transfer
during FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 available unexpended appropriation balances as
certified by the chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human
Services from the Beatrice State Developmental Center, Program 421, to
Developmental Disability Aid, Program 424, and Medical Assistance, Program 348.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, up to $8,000,000, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 106. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 424 - Developmental Disability Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 212,662,155 229,386,106
CASH FUND 23,367,913 23,367,913
FEDERAL FUND est. 299,496,574 291,402,323
PROGRAM TOTAL 535,526,642 544,156,342
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$212,662,155 General Funds, $23,367,913 Cash Funds, and $299,496,574 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $229,386,106
General Funds, $23,367,913 Cash Funds, and $291,402,323 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $16,000,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $16,000,000 Cash Funds from
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to be used for services for persons with
developmental disabilities (1) who were on the waiting list for such services
prior to July 1, 2001, and began receiving such services on and after such date
and (2) who are on the waiting list for such services on and after July 1,
2019, beginning with those who have been on the waiting list for the greatest
length of time past their date of need.
Sec. 107. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 502 - Public Health Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 7,083,060 7,083,060
CASH FUND 9,339,000 9,730,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 16,422,060 16,813,060
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,083,060 General Funds and $9,339,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $7,083,060 General Funds and $9,730,000 Cash Funds for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $2,100,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $2,100,000 General Funds
for the seven community health centers funded through Federal Program 330,
Public Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers Consolidation Act of 1996. Each
of the following centers is to receive $300,000: Charles Drew Health Center,
OneWorld Community Health Centers, East Central District Health Department —
Good Neighbor Community Health Center, Community Action Partnership of Western
Nebraska, Midtown Health Center, Bluestem Health, and Heartland Health Center.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $1,400,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $1,400,000 General Funds
for the seven community health centers funded through Federal Program 330,
Public Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers Consolidation Act of 1996 for
dental services. Each of the following centers is to receive $200,000: Charles
Drew Health Center, OneWorld Community Health Centers, East Central District
-26-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Health Department — Good Neighbor Community Health Center, Community Action
Partnership of Western Nebraska, Midtown Health Center, Bluestem Health, and
Heartland Health Center.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $325,000 General Funds and $750,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund and for FY2026-27 $325,000 General Funds and $750,000
Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for the seven community
health centers funded through Federal Program 330, Public Law 104-299, the
federal Health Centers Consolidation Act of 1996. Each center is to receive an
amount to be distributed proportionally based on the previous fiscal year's
number of uninsured clients as reported on the Uniform Data System Report
provided to the United States Department of Health and Human Services Bureau of
Primary Health Care. The distribution shall be made to Charles Drew Health
Center, OneWorld Community Health Centers, East Central District Health
Department — Good Neighbor Community Health Center, Community Action
Partnership of Western Nebraska Health Center, Midtown Health Center, Bluestem
Health, and Heartland Health Center.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $300,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $300,000 General Funds to
provide funds to tribally owned, urban-based, federally qualified health
centers designated under the federal Indian Self-Determination and Education
Assistance Act, Public Law 93-638, as such act existed on January 1, 2025.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2026-27 $500,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for aid
to Midtown Health Center to fund expanded health care access through the
community health center, including, but not limited to, expanding existing
lines of service such as behavioral health or dental services, adding new lines
of service and locations, purchasing equipment, or completing capital projects.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $2,898,246 General Funds and $5,605,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for public health departments. There is included in the
amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $2,898,246 General Funds and
$5,605,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for public health
departments. There is included in the amount shown in this section for
FY2025-26 $2,898,246 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $2,898,246 General Funds
to be distributed equally among the eighteen public health departments. There
is included in the amount shown in this section for FY2025-26 $5,405,000 Cash
Funds and for FY2026-27 $5,405,000 Cash Funds to be distributed among the
eighteen public health departments pursuant to section 71-1628.08. There is
included in the amount shown in this section for FY2025-26 $200,000 Cash Funds
and for FY2026-27 $200,000 Cash Funds to be distributed equally among the
eighteen public health departments.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $31,713 General Funds and $1,526,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for minority public health services in counties having a
minority population equal to or exceeding five percent of the total population
of the county in the first and third congressional districts as determined by
the most recent federal decennial census. There is included in the amount shown
as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $31,713 General Funds and $1,526,000 Cash
Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for minority public health
services in counties having a minority population equal to or exceeding five
percent of the total population of the county in the first and third
congressional districts as determined by the most recent federal decennial
census. The Department of Health and Human Services shall distribute the funds
on a per capita basis for the purpose of implementing a minority health
initiative which may target, but shall not be limited to, infant mortality,
cardiovascular disease, obesity, diabetes, and asthma.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $28,101 General Funds and $1,349,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund to be distributed equally to the community health centers
in the second congressional district funded through Federal Program 330, Public
Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers Consolidation Act of 1996. Such funds
shall be used for the purpose of implementing a minority health initiative
which may target, but shall not be limited to, infant mortality, cardiovascular
disease, obesity, diabetes, and asthma. There is included in the amount shown
as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $28,101 General Funds and $1,349,000 Cash
Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to be distributed equally to the
community health centers in the second congressional district funded through
Federal Program 330, Public Law 104-299, the federal Health Centers
Consolidation Act of 1996. Such funds shall be used for the purpose of
implementing a minority health initiative which may target, but shall not be
limited to, infant mortality, cardiovascular disease, obesity, diabetes, and
asthma.
Sec. 108. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 514 - Health Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 7,352,196 7,352,196
CASH FUND 20,325,817 20,325,817
-27-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FEDERAL FUND est. 84,079,725 84,079,725
PROGRAM TOTAL 111,757,738 111,757,738
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,352,196 General Funds, $20,325,817 Cash Funds, and $84,079,725 Federal Funds
estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $7,352,196 General
Funds, $20,325,817 Cash Funds, and $84,079,725 Federal Funds estimate for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $653,759
General Funds for FY2025-26 and $653,759 General Funds for FY2026-27, which
shall only be used for the following purposes: Reimbursement for the provision
of pap smears, colposcopy, cervical biopsy, cryotherapy, loop electrosurgical
excision procedure (LEEP), and such other treatments and procedures as may be
developed for the followup of abnormal pap smears; the diagnosis and treatment
of sexually transmitted diseases, including, but not limited to, chlamydia,
gonorrhea, HPV (genital warts), and herpes; and associated laboratory and
equipment costs and staff training costs relating to the use of colposcopy
equipment. None of the General Funds provided under this program shall be used
to perform or facilitate the performance of abortion or to counsel or refer for
abortion.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $300,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for state
aid to a nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 providing health care
screening, sports competitions, educational opportunities, and leadership
training for persons with developmental or intellectual disabilities, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the amount shown as
aid for this program for FY2026-27 $300,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health
Care Cash Fund for state aid to a nonprofit organization holding a certificate
of exemption under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986
providing health care screening, sports competitions, educational
opportunities, and leadership training for persons with developmental or
intellectual disabilities, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $200,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for the
Poison Control Center at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, which shall
only be used by the medical center for the Poison Control Center. There is
included in the amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $200,000
Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for the Poison Control
Center at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, which shall only be used
by the medical center for the Poison Control Center.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $500,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to carry
out provisions of the Brain Injury Assistance Act. There is included in the
amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $500,000 Cash Funds from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to carry out provisions of the Brain Injury
Assistance Act.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $1,100,000 General Funds for evidence-based early intervention home
visitation programs. There is included in the amount shown as aid for this
program for FY2026-27 $1,100,000 General Funds for evidence-based early
intervention home visitation programs.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 up to $70,000 General Funds and up to $130,000 Cash Funds from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund to contract with the University of Nebraska
Medical Center for the Nebraska Perinatal Quality Improvement Collaborative.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27 up
to $70,000 General Funds and up to $130,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health
Care Cash Fund to contract with the University of Nebraska Medical Center for
the Nebraska Perinatal Quality Improvement Collaborative.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $289,416 General Funds to contract for services for implementation of
a statewide drug disposal project. There is included in the amount shown as aid
for this program for FY2026-27 $289,416 General Funds to contract for services
for implementation of a statewide drug disposal project.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $555,039 General Funds for citizen advocacy. There is included in the
amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $559,039 General Funds for
citizen advocacy.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 up to $542,000 General Funds for tuition reimbursement for emergency
medical services responders' initial and ongoing training. There is included in
the amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27 up to $542,000 General
Funds for tuition reimbursement for emergency medical services responders'
initial and ongoing training.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $2,700,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for
pediatric cancer research at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, which
shall only be used by the medical center for research on pediatric cancer.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27
$2,700,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for pediatric
-28-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
cancer research at the University of Nebraska Medical Center, which shall only
be used by the medical center for research on pediatric cancer.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $500,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for the
University of Nebraska Medical Center, which shall only be used to contract
with a nonprofit organization located in Nebraska that provides cancer
screening, prevention, support, and education for all ninety-three counties in
the state. There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2026-27 $500,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for the
University of Nebraska Medical Center, which shall only be used to contract
with a nonprofit organization located in Nebraska that provides cancer
screening, prevention, support, and education for all ninety-three counties in
the state.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $475,000 General Funds for a prescription drug donation program,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the amount
shown as aid for this program for FY2026-27 $475,000 General Funds for a
prescription drug donation program, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 109. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 559 - Care Management
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,315,560 2,315,560
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,315,560 2,315,560
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$2,315,560 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$2,315,560 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 110. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 571 - Community-Based Aging Services
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 9,407,019 9,407,019
FEDERAL FUND est. 9,469,241 9,469,241
PROGRAM TOTAL 18,876,260 18,876,260
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$9,407,019 General Funds and $9,469,241 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $9,407,019 General Funds and
$9,469,241 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
Sec. 111. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 621 - Stem Cell Research
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 450,000 450,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 450,000 450,000
SALARY LIMIT 13,500 13,500
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$436,500 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $436,500
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$450,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund. There is included
in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $450,000 Cash Funds from the
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund.
Sec. 112. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 622 - Cancer Research
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 3,799,452 3,799,452
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,799,452 3,799,452
SALARY LIMIT 111,739 111,739
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26 an
estimated $3,291,113 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 an estimated $3,291,113 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Sec. 113. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
-29-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Program No. 623 - Biomedical Research
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 15,000,000 15,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 15,000,000 15,000,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$15,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$15,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$15,000,000 Cash Funds for biomedical research from the Nebraska Health Care
Cash Fund. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$15,000,000 Cash Funds for biomedical research from the Nebraska Health Care
Cash Fund. At least $700,000 of such appropriated funds shall be used annually
for research to improve racial and ethnic minority health. Of the amount
appropriated each fiscal year, $11,000,000 shall be distributed to the
University of Nebraska and $4,000,000 shall be available for contracts with
other postsecondary educational institutions having colleges of medicine in
Nebraska and their affiliated research hospitals in Nebraska. Each recipient of
funds under this section shall report annually to the Legislature and to the
Governor regarding the use of such funds received. The report required to be
submitted to the Legislature by this section shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 114. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 624 - Health Information Exchange
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 4,774,860 4,774,860
FEDERAL FUND est. 9,957,274 9,957,274
PROGRAM TOTAL 14,732,134 14,732,134
Sec. 115. AGENCY NO. 25 — DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Program No. 931 - YRTC's Facility Improvements
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
NEBRASKA CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION FUND 2,250,000 -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,250,000 -0- -0-
The Department of Health and Human Services is hereby authorized to
construct a housing facility at the YRTC-Hastings.
Sec. 116. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Total expenditures by the Department of Transportation for permanent and
temporary salaries and per diems shall not exceed $155,441,627 for FY2025-26.
Total expenditures by the Department of Transportation for permanent and
temporary salaries and per diems shall not exceed $161,284,354 for FY2026-27.
There is hereby appropriated for FY2025-26 $543,900,000 from the Highway
Cash Fund to the Roads Operations Cash Fund, which fund is hereby appropriated.
There is included in the amount appropriated from the Highway Cash Fund to the
Roads Operations Cash Fund for FY2025-26 $6,312,705 for assistance to the local
transit authorities program and intercity bus system assistance.
There is hereby appropriated for FY2026-27 $550,700,000 from the Highway
Cash Fund to the Roads Operations Cash Fund, which fund is hereby appropriated.
There is included in the amount appropriated from the Highway Cash Fund to the
Roads Operations Cash Fund for FY2026-27 $6,312,705 for assistance to the local
transit authorities program and intercity bus system assistance.
Sec. 117. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 26 - Administration and Services
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 4,392,590 4,392,590
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,392,590 4,392,590
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$40,200 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $40,200
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 118. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 301 - Public Airports
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-30-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
CASH FUND est. 59,348,300 51,348,300
PROGRAM TOTAL 59,348,300 51,348,300
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$59,348,300 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $51,348,300 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Sec. 119. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 305 - Assistance to Local Transit Authorities
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 6,312,705 6,312,705
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,312,705 6,312,705
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$6,312,705 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included within state aid for FY2025-26 $535,000 Cash Funds for
intercity bus system assistance and $5,777,705 Cash Funds for the public
transportation assistance program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$6,312,705 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included within state aid for FY2026-27 $535,000 Cash Funds for
intercity bus system assistance and $5,777,705 Cash Funds for the public
transportation assistance program.
Sec. 120. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 562 - Nebraska Broadband Office
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 1,720,839 1,721,675
FEDERAL FUND est. 139,960,000 93,640,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 141,680,839 95,361,675
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$139,960,000 Federal Funds est. for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $93,640,000 Federal Funds est. for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Sec. 121. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 568 - Highway Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 24,560,776 25,451,874
PROGRAM TOTAL 24,560,776 25,451,874
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
Sec. 122. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 569 - Construction
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 1,038,071,186 1,043,564,205
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,038,071,186 1,043,564,205
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Transportation
shall apply for and make maximum use of available federal funding, including
discretionary funding, on all highway construction projects that are eligible
for such assistance.
Sec. 123. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 572 - Service and Support
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 35,771,658 36,213,768
PROGRAM TOTAL 35,771,658 36,213,768
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
Sec. 124. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 574 - Maintenance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-31-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
CASH FUND est. 191,865,235 196,539,047
PROGRAM TOTAL 191,865,235 196,539,047
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
Sec. 125. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 596 - State-Owned Aircraft
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 526,142 526,142
PROGRAM TOTAL 526,142 526,142
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
Sec. 126. AGENCY NO. 27 — DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Program No. 901 - Facility Improvements
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND -0- 4,800,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 4,800,000 -0-
The Department of Transportation is hereby authorized to prepare program
statements on and design and build the following projects:
Facility improvements — Falls City maintenance project
Facility improvements — general maintenance
Sec. 127. AGENCY NO. 28 — DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS
Program No. 511 - Veterans' Affairs
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 56,368,794 58,078,076
CASH FUND 16,099,266 16,135,105
FEDERAL FUND est. 27,538,678 28,000,305
PROGRAM TOTAL 100,006,738 102,213,486
SALARY LIMIT 58,565,553 60,047,129
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 36 - Departmental Administration
No. 37 - Veterans' Cemeteries
No. 510 - State Service Office
No. 519 - Central Nebraska Veterans' Home
No. 520 - Norfolk Veterans' Home
No. 521 - Western Nebraska Veterans' Home
No. 522 - Eastern Nebraska Veterans' Home
Sec. 128. AGENCY NO. 30 — STATE ELECTRICAL BOARD
Program No. 197 - Public Protection
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 2,758,509 2,825,319
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,758,509 2,825,319
SALARY LIMIT 1,520,018 1,526,656
Sec. 129. AGENCY NO. 31 — MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Program No. 191 - Governor's Emergency Program - COVID-19
There is no salary limitation for this program.
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 130. AGENCY NO. 31 — MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Program No. 192 - Governor's Emergency Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 5,000,000 5,000,000
CASH FUND est. 250,000 250,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 4,500,000 4,500,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 9,750,000 9,750,000
There is no salary limitation for this program.
-32-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
The unexpended General Fund and Cash Fund appropriation balances existing
on June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$5,000,000 General Funds, $250,000 Cash Funds estimate, and $4,500,000 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $5,000,000 General Funds, $250,000 Cash Funds estimate,
and $4,500,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid.
Expenditures from this program shall not be restricted to state aid if
other expenditures are necessary to fulfill the goals of the Governor's
Emergency Program.
Sec. 131. AGENCY NO. 31 — MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Program No. 544 - National and State Guard
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 4,045,314 4,138,048
CASH FUND 475,201 475,201
FEDERAL FUND est. 20,442,543 20,681,696
PROGRAM TOTAL 24,963,058 25,294,945
SALARY LIMIT 9,338,908 9,600,831
Sec. 132. AGENCY NO. 31 — MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Program No. 545 - Emergency Management
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,335,947 1,373,883
CASH FUND est. 641,392 648,370
FEDERAL FUND est. 3,996,350 4,048,975
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,973,689 6,071,228
SALARY LIMIT 2,628,350 2,703,609
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amounts shown.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,570,604 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $1,570,604 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Sec. 133. AGENCY NO. 31 — MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Program No. 548 - Tuition Assistance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,052,793 1,052,793
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,052,793 1,052,793
SALARY LIMIT -0- -0-
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,052,793 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$1,052,793 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 134. AGENCY NO. 31 — MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Program No. 927 - Federal-State Match Construction Projects
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
NEBRASKA CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION FUND 2,259,305 -0- -0-
FEDERAL FUND est. 4,179,320 -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,438,625 -0- -0-
The Military Department is hereby authorized to engage in various military
master capital project agreements with the National Guard Bureau, including
projects at the Greenlief National Guard/Reserve Center, the Mead Readiness
Center, the Lincoln Readiness Center, the York Readiness Center, the Sidney
Readiness Center, and the Joint Forces Headquarters Building.
Sec. 135. AGENCY NO. 32 — BOARD OF EDUCATIONAL LANDS AND FUNDS
Program No. 529 - Land Surveys
-33-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 497,895 515,252
CASH FUND 49,883 51,791
PROGRAM TOTAL 547,778 567,043
SALARY LIMIT 376,857 389,507
Any General Funds expended for costs associated with the administration of
school lands shall be reimbursed, on a quarterly basis, to the General Fund by
the Board of Educational Lands and Funds.
Sec. 136. AGENCY NO. 32 — BOARD OF EDUCATIONAL LANDS AND FUNDS
Program No. 554 - Disputed Survey Settlements
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 20,483 20,483
PROGRAM TOTAL 20,483 20,483
Sec. 137. AGENCY NO. 32 — BOARD OF EDUCATIONAL LANDS AND FUNDS
Program No. 582 - School Land Trust
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 21,163,355 21,258,224
PROGRAM TOTAL 21,163,355 21,258,224
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown. The
appropriation contained in this program is provided pursuant to section
72-232.02.
Sec. 138. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 162 - Environmental Trust
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 26,602,651 26,622,563
PROGRAM TOTAL 26,602,651 26,622,563
SALARY LIMIT 362,301 373,707
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$25,750,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$25,750,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 139. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 330 - Habitat Development
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 9,080,148 9,184,398
FEDERAL FUND est. 3,900,673 3,900,673
PROGRAM TOTAL 12,980,821 13,085,071
SALARY LIMIT 2,180,909 2,249,462
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,725,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,725,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 140. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 336 - Wildlife Conservation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,072,461 2,072,461
CASH FUND 40,129,225 40,190,922
FEDERAL FUND est. 4,276,187 4,284,810
PROGRAM TOTAL 46,477,873 46,548,193
SALARY LIMIT 19,705,168 20,134,060
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$585,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
-34-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $585,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 141. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 337 - Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,010,596 1,010,596
CASH FUND 7,658,999 7,909,159
PROGRAM TOTAL 8,669,595 8,919,755
SALARY LIMIT 3,987,182 4,112,329
Sec. 142. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 338 - Niobrara Council
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 52,500 52,500
CASH FUND 1,000 1,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 125,000 125,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 178,500 178,500
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$52,500 General Funds, $1,000 Cash Funds, and $125,000 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in
the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $52,500 General Funds, $1,000
Cash Funds, and $125,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only
be used for such purpose.
Sec. 143. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 549 - Parks - Administration and Operation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,816,945 2,816,945
CASH FUND 35,836,241 36,724,238
FEDERAL FUND est. 50,000 50,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 38,703,186 39,591,183
SALARY LIMIT 18,044,762 18,734,476
Sec. 144. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 550 - Planning and Trails Coordination
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 559,668 559,668
CASH FUND 2,394,449 1,789,895
FEDERAL FUND est. 111,172 111,172
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,065,289 2,460,735
SALARY LIMIT 1,231,050 1,292,121
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$750,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount expended for the
development and maintenance of boundary fences along the Cowboy Trail be
limited to $64,000 Cash Funds during each fiscal year.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated, up to $5,400,000 to fund the MOPAC trail.
Any reappropriated amounts are hereby designated as state aid and shall
only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 145. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 617 - Engineering and Area Maintenance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,856,948 1,856,948
CASH FUND 2,508,986 2,630,144
-35-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,365,934 4,487,092
SALARY LIMIT 2,277,105 2,346,588
Sec. 146. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 628 - Credit Card Discount Sales
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 852,205 715,205
PROGRAM TOTAL 852,205 715,205
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
Sec. 147. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 846 - Nebraska Public Safety Communication System
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 16,029 16,029
CASH FUND 318,971 318,971
PROGRAM TOTAL 335,000 335,000
Sec. 148. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 900 - State Park System Facility Improvements
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND 1,200,000 -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,200,000 -0- -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to develop new,
maintain, and improve boating facilities and fishing access amenities.
Sec. 149. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 901 - State Parks Facilities Deferred Maintenance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND 5,500,000 5,500,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,500,000 5,500,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to make deferred
repairs and maintenance improvements at facilities in the state park system and
replace and upgrade facilities in the state park system with the appropriation
to this program.
Sec. 150. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 965 - Water Recreation Enhancement
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND -0- -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- -0- -0-
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated, up to $55,082,087 for projects identified in this
section.
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to provide recreational
upgrades at Lake McConaughy State Recreation Area and Lewis and Clark State
Recreation Area which may include, but are not limited to, campground
expansion, road repairs, and other projects to increase access and enjoyments.
Sec. 151. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 966 - State Recreational Trails
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND 100,000 -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 100,000 -0- -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to complete projects
for the Cowboy Recreational and Nature Trail and the Lied Platte River Bridge
Trail, including, but not limited to, trail surfacing, bridge decking, culvert
construction, trailside amenities, and parking.
Sec. 152. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 967 - State Park Improvements
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND -0- -0- -0-
-36-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- -0- -0-
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated.
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to complete projects at
Fort Robinson State Park, including the removal of the dam at Carter P. Johnson
Lake, the restoration of Soldier Creek, and interior upgrades to existing
lodging units.
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to renovate the lodge
at Eugene T. Mahoney State Park.
Sec. 153. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 969 - State Recreation Areas
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND est. 500,000 500,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 500,000 500,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to make state
recreation area improvements statewide with the appropriation to this program.
It is intended that the following projects be undertaken with funds
appropriated to this program for FY2025-26:
Area improvements to implement master plan - Lake McConaughy and Lake
Ogallala State Recreation Areas, $500,000.
It is intended that the following projects be undertaken with funds
appropriated to this program for FY2026-27:
Area improvements to implement master plan - Lake McConaughy and Lake
Ogallala State Recreation Areas, $500,000.
Sec. 154. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 971 - Special Use Areas
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND est. 475,000 365,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 475,000 365,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to build, maintain, and
repair facilities required for holding and studying bighorn sheep.
Sec. 155. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 972 - Administrative Facilities - IMPR
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND est. 2,610,000 445,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,610,000 445,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to make improvements to
administrative facilities for the Lincoln headquarters and other district
offices.
Sec. 156. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 973 - Fish Production
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND est. 2,500,000 2,500,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,500,000 2,500,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to upgrade, maintain,
and repair fisheries facilities at the Calamus, North Platte, Rock Creek, and
Valentine hatcheries, the Grove Trout Rearing Station, district offices, and
service centers.
Sec. 157. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 975 - Emergency Repairs - Parks
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND 500,000 500,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 500,000 500,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to make emergency
repairs statewide to facilities in the state park system with the appropriation
to this program.
Sec. 158. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 976 - Emergency Repairs - Wildlife
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND est. 685,000 151,000 -0-
-37-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
PROGRAM TOTAL 685,000 151,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to make emergency
repairs to Oak Valley and George Sylas facilities impacted by flooding, and
match federal funding from the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
Sec. 159. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 979 - Cowboy Trail Emergency Repairs
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND est. 544,000 250,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 544,000 250,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to conduct emergency
repair and maintenance work on the Cowboy trails facilities.
Sec. 160. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
Program No. 981 - Aquatic Habitat Enhancement and Restoration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND 1,500,000 1,500,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,500,000 1,500,000 -0-
The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to enhance and
rehabilitate aquatic habitat statewide with the appropriation to this program.
Sec. 161. AGENCY NO. 33 — GAME AND PARKS COMMISSION
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Game and Parks Commission may
apply for and make maximum use of federal funding on all capital construction
projects which are eligible for such assistance. It is the intent of the
Legislature that all funds appropriated to the Game and Parks Commission for
capital construction projects may be spent for the purpose of the original
appropriation.
Sec. 162. AGENCY NO. 34 — NEBRASKA LIBRARY COMMISSION
Program No. 252 - Library and Information Services
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 3,257,988 3,363,036
CASH FUND 45,484 45,484
FEDERAL FUND est. 1,150,206 1,187,191
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,453,678 4,595,711
SALARY LIMIT 2,865,897 2,943,242
Sec. 163. AGENCY NO. 34 — NEBRASKA LIBRARY COMMISSION
Program No. 302 - Library Development
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,481,153 1,481,153
FEDERAL FUND est. 515,030 515,030
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,996,183 1,996,183
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,481,153 General Funds and $515,030 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,481,153 General Funds and
$515,030 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
Sec. 164. AGENCY NO. 35 — NEBRASKA LIQUOR CONTROL COMMISSION
Program No. 73 - Licensing and Regulation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,009,807 2,009,807
CASH FUND 100,000 100,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,109,807 2,109,807
SALARY LIMIT 1,085,475 1,085,475
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 165. AGENCY NO. 36 — STATE RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION
Program No. 74 - Enforcement of Standards - Horseracing
-38-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 522,758 531,327
PROGRAM TOTAL 522,758 531,327
SALARY LIMIT 231,822 236,443
Sec. 166. AGENCY NO. 36 — STATE RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION
Program No. 81 - Racetrack Gaming
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 5,948,852 6,126,099
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,948,852 6,126,099
SALARY LIMIT 3,616,907 3,694,055
Sec. 167. AGENCY NO. 36 — STATE RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION
Program No. 87 - Casino Tax Revenue
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 20,000,000 20,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 20,000,000 20,000,000
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$20,000,000 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $20,000,000 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Sec. 168. AGENCY NO. 36 — STATE RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION
Program No. 88 - Horseracing Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 120,000 120,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 120,000 120,000
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$120,000 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$120,000 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 169. AGENCY NO. 37 — NEBRASKA WORKERS' COMPENSATION COURT
Program No. 530 - Court Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 5,625,320 5,625,320
FEDERAL FUND est. 64,358 64,358
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,689,678 5,689,678
SALARY LIMIT 3,422,166 3,594,528
Sec. 170. AGENCY NO. 39 — NEBRASKA BRAND COMMITTEE
Program No. 75 - Nebraska Brand Committee
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 6,567,682 6,802,519
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,567,682 6,802,519
SALARY LIMIT 4,076,903 4,205,232
Sec. 171. AGENCY NO. 40 — NEBRASKA MOTOR VEHICLE INDUSTRY LICENSING BOARD
Program No. 76 - Enforcement of Standards - Automotive Industry
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,044,970 1,151,294
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,044,970 1,151,294
SALARY LIMIT 708,887 777,894
Sec. 172. AGENCY NO. 41 — STATE REAL ESTATE COMMISSION
-39-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Program No. 77 - Enforcement of Standards - Real Estate
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,718,907 1,770,297
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,718,907 1,770,297
SALARY LIMIT 885,285 911,674
Sec. 173. AGENCY NO. 45 — BOARD OF BARBER EXAMINERS
Program No. 80 - Enforcement of Standards - Barbering
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 210,264 219,773
PROGRAM TOTAL 210,264 219,773
SALARY LIMIT 132,674 138,047
Sec. 174. AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
Program No. 200 - Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 363,059,147 375,144,831
CASH FUND 7,586,125 2,586,125
FEDERAL FUND est. 2,299,947 2,300,175
REVOLVING FUND est. 22,969,492 23,305,194
PROGRAM TOTAL 395,914,711 403,336,325
SALARY LIMIT 227,602,622 234,936,292
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
There is included in the salary limitations provided by this section
$5,003,370 for FY2025-26 and $5,003,370 for FY2026-27 for Revolving Fund
salaries for program classifications 390 and 563, that shall not be limited to
the amounts shown.
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 260 - Nebraska Correctional Youth Facility
No. 300 - Tecumseh Correctional Center
No. 368 - Lincoln Community Corrections Center
No. 369 - Omaha Community Corrections Center
No. 370 - Central Office
No. 372 - Nebraska State Penitentiary
No. 373 - Nebraska Center for Women - York
No. 375 - Diagnostic and Evaluation Center
No. 376 - Lincoln Correctional Center
No. 377 - Omaha Correctional Center
No. 386 - McCook Incarceration Work Camp
No. 389 - Adult Parole Program
No. 390 - Federal Surplus Property
No. 391 - Reception and Treatment Center
No. 495 - Department Central Warehouse
No. 563 - Correctional Industries
Revolving Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amounts shown.
It is intended that the Department of Correctional Services shall maintain
a Department Contingency Fund and a Department Equipment Fund.
Sec. 175. AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
Program No. 213 - Corrections Workforce Recruitment and Development
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 973,465 973,465
PROGRAM TOTAL 973,465 973,465
Sec. 176. AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
Program No. 214 - Vocational and Life Skills
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 6,251,299 6,313,029
CASH FUND 8,300,000 4,800,000
-40-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
REVOLVING FUND 116,450 116,450
PROGRAM TOTAL 14,667,749 11,229,479
SALARY LIMIT 1,799,490 1,832,706
(1) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$4,000,000 General Funds and $8,300,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $4,000,000 General Funds and $4,800,000 Cash Funds for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that $500,000 General Funds and
$500,000 Cash Funds of the amounts shown as state aid in both FY2025-26 and
FY2026-27 be awarded to organizations that provide paid preparatory training
programs, preapprenticeship programs, or other paid training that leads
directly into a federal registered apprenticeship program and that the grants
require a minimum one-to-one cash or in-kind matching contribution. Unallocated
grant funds held by the Department of Correctional Services at the end of the
fiscal year shall be reappropriated for the next fiscal year.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that $7,800,000 Cash Funds of the
amount shown as state aid for FY2025-26 and $4,300,000 Cash Funds of the amount
shown as state aid for FY2026-27 be awarded as grants to organizations
providing the following services: Reentry and restorative justice programming
for adult and juvenile offenders who are committed to a facility and for adult
and juvenile offenders who are released from commitment; reentry centers;
transitional, community, and half-way housing; supportive permanent housing;
wrap-around services; facility-based programming, including unit-based
programing; community corrections; front-end, middle, and back-end services and
interventions; and family support. Unallocated grant funds held by the
Department of Correctional Services at the end of the fiscal year shall be
reappropriated for the next fiscal year. It is the intent of the Legislature
that grants awarded under this section, except those described in subsection
(2) of this section, be paid in advance on a monthly basis. The Department of
Correctional Services may require grantees to return unused funds upon
documentation that any approved service is not provided or may apply such
unused funds to future monthly payments.
(4) The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for the purpose of state aid.
Sec. 177. AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
Program No. 725 - Building Depreciation Charges
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 71,915 71,915
PROGRAM TOTAL 71,915 71,915
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$71,915 General Funds for state building rental depreciation charges, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $71,915 General Funds for state building rental
depreciation charges, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 178. AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
Program No. 905 - Correctional Facilities: Site Selection and Planning
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
NEBRASKA CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION FUND 135,000,000 10,000,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 135,000,000 10,000,000 -0-
The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized to continue
the process of acquiring property for, designing, constructing, and developing
a new multi-custody-level correctional facility with capacity to house
approximately one thousand five hundred twelve inmates, with a mix of maximum,
medium, and minimum custody beds, including site selection and an option to
purchase.
Such authorization shall be contingent on the Department of Correctional
Services, in conjunction with the Department of Administrative Services, at an
appropriately deemed time, beginning the decommissioning of a multi-custody
level correctional facility. Decommissioning of such facility, in part or in
whole, shall comply with sections 72-812 to 72-818. A portion of the
appropriation to this program may be used for expenses necessary to
decommission such a facility.
The new facility shall be constructed in a manner that ensures adequate
space, housing features, and other amenities that will facilitate meaningful
reentry, programming, and clinical treatment. All features of construction
shall be done in a manner that positively impacts inmate behavior, including,
but not limited to, providing appropriate correctional beds for both long-term
and specialized housing, providing design capacity for living spaces, common
spaces, telehealth stations dedicated for programming, and other relevant areas
-41-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
that allow for substance abuse and mental health counseling and treatment, job
training, educational services, and any other programs or services that allow
for humane care and housing and contribute to reduced recidivism rates.
Sec. 179. AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
Program No. 912 - Nebraska Correctional Center for Women
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
NEBRASKA CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION FUND -0- -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- -0- -0-
The unexpended Nebraska Capital Construction Fund appropriation balance
existing on June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized to complete
repairs on the Nebraska Correctional Center for Women in York, Nebraska, and to
use funds for the construction of vocational and educational buildings on the
facility grounds.
Sec. 180. AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
Program No. 913 - Security System Upgrades
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
NEBRASKA CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION FUND 2,500,000 2,500,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,500,000 2,500,000 -0-
The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized to upgrade
security system components at various Department of Correctional Services
facilities statewide, including, but not limited to: Replacement of door
controls and perimeter detection systems, upgrade of existing video equipment,
and upgrade and replacement of security camera systems.
Sec. 181. AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
Program No. 914 - Infrastructure and Maintenance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
NEBRASKA CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION FUND 4,000,000 4,000,000 -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,000,000 4,000,000 -0-
The Department of Correctional Services is hereby authorized to undertake
various high priority infrastructure and maintenance projects related to
facility roofing, electrical, boiler/chiller/HVAC, fire and life safety, and
other needs, which projects the Task Force for Building Renewal is unable to
fully address.
Sec. 182. AGENCY NO. 47 — NEBRASKA EDUCATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS
COMMISSION
Program No. 533 - Network Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 11,264,473 11,543,452
CASH FUND 312,450 312,450
PROGRAM TOTAL 11,576,923 11,855,902
SALARY LIMIT 3,805,832 3,948,247
Sec. 183. AGENCY NO. 47 — NEBRASKA EDUCATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS
COMMISSION
Program No. 566 - Public Radio
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 562,752 573,131
CASH FUND 27,647 27,647
PROGRAM TOTAL 590,399 600,778
SALARY LIMIT 177,351 183,525
The limitation on expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and
per diems contained in this section does not include expenditures from trust
funds.
Sec. 184. AGENCY NO. 47 — NEBRASKA EDUCATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS
COMMISSION
-42-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Program No. 925 - Translator Replacement
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
NEBRASKA CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION FUND 150,000 -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 150,000 -0- -0-
The Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission is hereby
authorized to convert three existing VHF television translators to UHF in
northwestern Nebraska.
Sec. 185. AGENCY NO. 48 — COORDINATING COMMISSION FOR POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION
Program No. 640 - Postsecondary Education Coordination
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,633,790 1,689,068
CASH FUND 61,765 64,200
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,695,555 1,753,268
SALARY LIMIT 1,148,734 1,181,422
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26 an
estimated $115,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 an estimated $115,000
General Funds for Midwestern Higher Education Compact state membership dues.
Sec. 186. AGENCY NO. 48 — COORDINATING COMMISSION FOR POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION
Program No. 690 - Nebraska Opportunity Grant Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 7,093,430 7,093,430
CASH FUND 17,854,872 17,854,872
PROGRAM TOTAL 24,948,302 24,948,302
There are no personal services included in the appropriations in this
section.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,093,430 General Funds and $17,854,872 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $7,093,430 General Funds and $17,854,872 Cash Funds for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 187. AGENCY NO. 48 — COORDINATING COMMISSION FOR POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION
Program No. 691 - Access College Early Scholarship Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,500,000 1,500,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,500,000 1,500,000
There are no personal services included in the appropriations in this
section.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$100,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $-0- General Funds for technology
enhancements to the Access College Early web-based application.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,400,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$1,500,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
Sec. 188. AGENCY NO. 48 — COORDINATING COMMISSION FOR POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION
Program No. 692 - Higher Education Financial Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 8,000,000 8,000,000
CASH FUND 4,901,641 4,912,570
PROGRAM TOTAL 12,901,641 12,912,570
SALARY LIMIT 218,704 223,414
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$8,000,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
-43-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$8,000,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2025-26 $8,000,000 General Funds for state aid for Nebraska Career
Scholarships, of which $4,000,000 shall be allocated to community colleges and
$4,000,000 shall be allocated to private nonprofit Nebraska postsecondary
institutions. There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program for
FY2026-27 $8,000,000 General Funds for state aid for Nebraska Career
Scholarships, of which $4,000,000 shall be allocated to community colleges and
$4,000,000 shall be allocated to private nonprofit Nebraska postsecondary
institutions.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$4,555,200 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $4,555,200
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 189. AGENCY NO. 48 — COORDINATING COMMISSION FOR POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION
Program No. 695 - Guaranty Recovery Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 8,000 8,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 8,000 8,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$8,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $8,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 190. AGENCY NO. 50 — BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE NEBRASKA STATE
COLLEGES
Program No. 48 - Nebraska State Colleges - System Office
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 75,078,448 77,151,164
CASH FUND est. 47,058,529 47,058,529
FEDERAL FUND est. 52,120,000 52,120,000
REVOLVING FUND est. 10,564,000 10,564,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 184,820,977 186,893,693
(1) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$4,580,000 General Funds for state aid for Nebraska Career Scholarships, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $4,580,000 General Funds for state aid for Nebraska
Career Scholarships, which shall only be used for such purpose.
(2) The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, from the appropriation for the Nebraska Career Scholarship program is
hereby reappropriated.
(3) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$600,000 General Funds for state aid for the Rural Health Opportunity Program
and Public Health Early Admission Student Track scholarships. There is included
in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $600,000 General Funds for
state aid for the Rural Health Opportunity Program and Public Health Early
Admission Student Track scholarships.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that upon the approval of the
Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, the System Office of the
Nebraska State Colleges may divide and distribute the funds appropriated to
this program among Chadron State College, Peru State College, Wayne State
College, and the System Office of the Nebraska State Colleges.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature that Cash Fund revenue from
resident tuition, nonresident tuition, off-campus tuition, and fees separately
assessed shall be individually accounted for on the Nebraska Information
System.
(6) The Legislature reaffirms its intent to utilize the Nebraska
Educational Data System created by Laws 1978, LB 897, to support the
appropriations and oversight process for postsecondary education. It is further
the intent of the Legislature that all institutions provide the data in the
precise formats required by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education.
(7) The Legislature reaffirms its commitment to long-range and short-range
computer planning by the Nebraska state colleges. It is the intent of the
Legislature that comprehensive computer plans of the Nebraska state colleges be
updated biennially and submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, the
Department of Administrative Services, and the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education on or before October 15 of each odd-numbered year. The
plans required to be submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst by this
section shall be submitted electronically.
(8) The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the
-44-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
appropriations and expenditures of the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State
Colleges, Agency No. 50-0, and the Nebraska State Colleges, Agency Nos. 50-1,
50-3, and 50-4, according to NCHEMS-Program Classification Structure, Second
Edition. Expenditure authority shall be limited to program appropriations.
(9) It is the intent of the Legislature for the Board of Trustees of the
Nebraska State Colleges to utilize a trust fund to record revenue and expenses
for the Corrections Workforce Development Pathway program at Peru State
College.
Sec. 191. AGENCY NO. 50 — BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE NEBRASKA STATE
COLLEGES
Program No. 903 - State College Facilities - Sports Facilities Projects
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND 300,000 300,000 3,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 300,000 300,000 3,000,000
The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges is hereby authorized
to renovate and construct or improve facilities for intercollegiate athletics
and student fitness, recreation, and sport activities at the Nebraska State
Colleges.
Sec. 192. AGENCY NO. 50 — BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE NEBRASKA STATE
COLLEGES
Program No. 919 - State College Facilities Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
GENERAL FUND 1,125,000 1,125,000 25,705,000
REVOLVING FUND est. 1,440,000 1,440,000 18,720,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,565,000 2,565,000 44,425,000
The Legislature hereby acknowledges and reaffirms the directive made by
sections 85-423, 85-424, and 85-425, which authorizes the Board of Trustees of
the Nebraska State Colleges to make expenditures from the State College
Facilities Program exclusively for projects outlined in section 85-424.
Sec. 193. AGENCY NO. 50 — BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE NEBRASKA STATE
COLLEGES
Program No. 920 - Board Facilities Fee Fund Projects
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
REVOLVING FUND est. 930,000 930,000 9,300,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 930,000 930,000 9,300,000
The Legislature hereby acknowledges and reaffirms provisions of section
85-328 which authorize amounts accumulated in the State College Capital
Improvement Fee Fund to be expended for the purpose of paying the cost of
capital improvement projects approved by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska
State Colleges for facilities on campuses or lands owned or controlled by the
board.
Sec. 194. AGENCY NO. 50 — BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE NEBRASKA STATE
COLLEGES
Program No. 933 - Chadron State College Math Science Building
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
GENERAL FUND 2,216,000 2,216,000 17,728,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,216,000 2,216,000 17,728,000
The board is authorized to renovate and construct an addition to the Math
Science Building at Chadron State College. The amount of project costs to be
met by appropriations pursuant to this section is estimated at $24,094,000. The
board is further authorized to expend such other amounts as it may secure from
other sources for completion of the project.
Beginning with the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2013, and continuing
through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2035, the Legislature shall appropriate
each fiscal year from the General Fund an amount not less than $2,216,000 to be
used by the board to pay the costs of renovating and constructing an addition
to the Math Science Building at Chadron State College. The board may enter into
long-term financing contracts with any person, firm, or corporation for the
Math Science Building project. The payments of the costs of the projects may
occur over a contract period not to extend beyond June 30, 2035.
The board shall not pledge the credit of the State of Nebraska for the
payment of any sum owing on account of such contract, except that there may be
pledged for the payment of any such contract any appropriations made by the
Legislature for such purpose. No contract shall be entered into pursuant to
this section without prior approval by resolution by the board. The board may
also convey, lease, or lease back all or any part of the Math Science Building
project and the land on which such project is situated to such person, firm, or
corporation as the board may contract with pursuant to this section to
-45-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
facilitate the long-term payment of the costs of the Math Science Building
project. Any such conveyance or lease shall provide that when the costs of the
Math Science Building project have been paid, together with interest and other
costs thereon, the Math Science Building project and the land on which such
project is located shall become the property of the board. The board may
schedule contractual payments on a monthly, quarterly, or semiannual basis
consistent with the state fiscal year. On or before August 31, 2035, any funds
appropriated from the General Fund for the project held in the state treasury
and held by any trustee which are not necessary to meet the terms of any long-
term financing agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall be
transferred to the General Fund.
The Legislature finds and determines that the Math Science Building
project is of critical importance to the State of Nebraska. It is the intent of
the Legislature that the appropriations for the Math Science Building project
shall not be reduced until all contracts and securities relating to the
construction and financing of the Math Science Building project is completed or
paid but in no case shall such appropriations extend beyond the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2035.
No amount appropriated pursuant to this section may be applied by the
board to a project or financing to complete renovation of and construction of
an addition to the Math Science Building until existing financing contracts of
the board related to the Rangeland Center and U.S. Conn Library projects have
been provided for or paid.
Sec. 195. AGENCY NO. 51 — UNIVERSITY OF NEBRASKA
Program No. 781 - University - Administration
(1) There is hereby appropriated to the Board of Regents of the University
of Nebraska for expenditure and distribution to the campuses by the University
of Nebraska Central Administration the following sums of money.
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 703,683,768 708,054,475
PROGRAM TOTAL 703,683,768 708,054,475
(2) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$8,000,000 General Funds for state aid for Nebraska Career Scholarships, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $8,000,000 General Funds for state aid for Nebraska
Career Scholarships, which shall only be used for such purpose.
(3) The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, from the appropriation for the Nebraska Career Scholarship program is
hereby reappropriated.
(4) It is intended that the University of Nebraska Central Administration,
upon approval of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, divide and
distribute the funds appropriated in this section among all the campuses and
the central administration, including the Nebraska College of Technical
Agriculture at Curtis. At the direction of the board, these funds may be
supplemented by Cash Funds, Federal Funds, Revolving Funds, and Trust Funds.
(5) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
an estimated $3,914,049 General Funds and for FY2026-27 an estimated $3,938,360
General Funds for the Nebraska College of Technical Agriculture at Curtis.
(6) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
an estimated $2,804,862 General Funds and for FY2026-27 an estimated $2,804,862
General Funds for the Nebraska Forest Service Program.
(7) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,800,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $1,800,000 General Funds for
pediatric cancer of which $1,500,000 per year is for pediatric cancer research
and $300,000 per year is for pediatric cancer specialists.
(8) There is included in the appropriation to this program $400,000
General Funds for FY2025-26 and $400,000 General Funds for FY2026-27 for the
University of Nebraska to partner with the Department of Correctional Services,
the regional centers, or both to develop and offer programs for students
studying to become behavioral health professionals. Such programs shall include
clinical rotations at the Department of Correctional Services, the regional
center, or both, clinical supervision, stipends, and student coordination and
recruitment services. The University of Nebraska shall include a report on the
outcomes of such recruitment efforts with its biennial budget request submitted
in 2026 and 2028. The reports shall include information on whether the students
that participated in the clinical rotations subsequently worked in Nebraska as
behavioral health professionals.
(9) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$500,000 General Funds for the Robert B. Daugherty Water for Food Global
Institute to support water and agricultural research and existing collaborative
initiatives to implement best practices in water conservation. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $500,000 General
Funds for the Robert B. Daugherty Water for Food Global Institute to support
water and agricultural research and existing collaborative initiatives to
implement best practices in water conservation.
(10) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$5,000,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $5,000,000 General Funds for the
Behavioral Health Education Center of Nebraska.
(11) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Institute of Agriculture
-46-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
and Natural Resources and the Cooperative Extension Service are treated fairly
in the University of Nebraska 2025-2027 biennial budget-setting process.
(12)(a) There is included in the appropriation to this program for the
Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for FY2025-26 an estimated
$11,719,478 General Funds and for FY2026-27 an estimated $11,719,478 General
Funds, to be administered by Central Administration, for the purpose of
targeted research activities at the University of Nebraska. It is intended that
none of these funds be used for new capital construction or renovation, except
that a small portion may be used for short-term cash flow. Further, it is
intended that an estimated $315,291 of the estimated $11,719,478 for FY2025-26
and an estimated $315,291 of the estimated $11,719,478 for FY2026-27 be used in
conjunction with the Established Program to Stimulate Competitive Research
(EPSCoR) which is expected to have an increased emphasis on applied research
and technology transfer.
(b) It is intended that faculty teams, research centers, or individual
faculty from the various colleges and departments of all of the campuses of the
University of Nebraska should present research proposals to the Research Fund
Advisory Committee and Central Administration for the various targeted research
areas after the FY2025-26 appropriation has been made but prior to August 15,
2025. Inherent in this process is the concept that the best proposals be
selected regardless of the campus of origin and that selections be made on a
competitive basis.
(c) It is intended for the EPSCoR Program that faculty teams, clusters,
research centers, or individual faculty from the various colleges and
departments of all of the campuses of the University of Nebraska and Creighton
University should present to the EPSCoR Planning Committee research proposals
to be funded by the EPSCoR Program. Inherent in this process is the concept
that the best proposals be selected regardless of the campus of origin and that
selections be made on a competitive basis. Emphasis shall be placed on
technology transfer and the research needs of business and industry. It is
intended that the EPSCoR Planning Committee shall continue to develop the
Nebraska State Science and Technology Transfer Plan as part of the EPSCoR
Program. It is further intended that the existing Research Fund Advisory
Committee and the existing EPSCoR Planning Committee coordinate and integrate
the planning and project evaluation criteria and procedures for both the
Nebraska Research Initiative Program and the EPSCoR Program. Matching funds for
any research grants to Creighton University shall be in the form of a contract
in which specific services are identified and a time period is specified.
Creighton University shall provide an appropriate share of any match.
(13) It is intended that:
(a) The University of Nebraska shall report its expenditures on the
Allotment Status Report and Regular Budget Status Report according to its
internal operational and organizational structure, subject to approval by the
Accounting Administrator and the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services;
(b) The University of Nebraska shall report its expenditures on the
Program Classification Expenditure Report in the NCHEMS-Program Classification
Structure, Second Edition, subject to approval by the Accounting Administrator
and the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services;
(c) The University of Nebraska shall submit the budget request in the
NCHEMS-Program Classification Structure, Second Edition, for the University of
Nebraska-Lincoln with an informational budget request for the Institute of
Agriculture and Natural Resources, University of Nebraska at Omaha, University
of Nebraska Medical Center, University of Nebraska at Kearney, Nebraska College
of Technical Agriculture at Curtis, and University of Nebraska Central
Administration;
(d) Comprehensive computer plans at the University of Nebraska shall be
biennially updated and submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and to the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services on or before
September 1 of odd-numbered years; and
(e) The Nebraska Educational Data System created by Laws 1978, LB 897,
shall be utilized to support the appropriations and oversight process for
postsecondary education. It is further the intent of the Legislature that all
institutions shall provide the data in the precise formats required by the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education and that any expenditure of
General Funds on the development of new information systems, including any
student information system, meet the requirements of the Nebraska Educational
Data System as determined by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education.
Sec. 196. AGENCY NO. 51 — UNIVERSITY OF NEBRASKA
Program No. 906 - NU Facilities Renewal
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
GENERAL FUND 4,462,928 4,462,928 102,647,344
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,462,928 4,462,928 102,647,344
(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that after the terms of any long-
term financing agreements have been met for the Nebraska College of Technical
Agriculture at Curtis Education Center, the annual $820,000 General Fund
appropriation as contained in Laws 2017, LB 330, section 35, be continued
-47-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
through 2050. The annual $820,000 General Fund appropriation shall be used for
renewal, renovations, or repair of existing university facilities.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that after the terms of any long-
term financing agreements have been met for the College of Nursing Building -
Lincoln Division, the annual $1,477,000 General Fund appropriation as contained
in Laws 2017, LB 330, section 37, be continued through 2050. The annual
$1,477,000 General Fund appropriation shall be used for renewal, renovations,
or repair of existing university facilities.
(3) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may enter into
long-term financing contracts with any person, firm, or corporation to finance
university facilities. The Board of Regents may also convey, lease, or lease
back all or any part of the university facilities and the land on which any
such facility is situated to such person, firm, or corporation as the Board of
Regents may contract with pursuant to this section to facilitate the long-term
payment of the cost of the facilities. Any such conveyance or lease shall
provide that when the cost of the facility has been paid, together with
interest and other costs thereon, the facility and the land on which such
facility is located shall become the property of the Board of Regents. The
Board of Regents may schedule contractual payments on a monthly, quarterly, or
semiannual basis consistent with the state fiscal year.
(4) Payment of the costs of the renewal, renovation, or repair of existing
university facilities for which the General Fund appropriations described in
this section are identified as a repayment source may occur over a contract
period not to extend beyond June 30, 2062. The Board of Regents shall not
pledge the credit of the State of Nebraska for any such contract, except that
there may be pledged for payment of any such contract any appropriations made
by the Legislature for such purpose.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriations described
in this section shall not be reduced until all contracts and securities
relating to the construction and financing of the facilities are completed or
paid but in no case shall such appropriations extend beyond the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2062.
(6) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, as part of the
capital construction budget request, shall include the status of completed and
ongoing projects utilizing state funding under this program, and a list of
projects planned for the next five years.
(7) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall provide to
the Task Force for Building Renewal semiannual reports concerning the status of
each project receiving funding from this program.
Sec. 197. AGENCY NO. 51 — UNIVERSITY OF NEBRASKA
Program No. 920 - University of Nebraska Facilities Program
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
GENERAL FUND 13,500,000 13,500,000 526,055,136
CASH FUND est. 18,000,000 18,000,000 630,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 31,500,000 31,500,000 1,156,055,136
The Legislature hereby acknowledges and reaffirms the directive made by
sections 85-420, 85-421, and 85-422, which authorizes the Board of Regents to
make expenditures from appropriated funds for the University of Nebraska
Facilities Program exclusively for projects as outlined in section 85-421.
Sec. 198. AGENCY NO. 51 — UNIVERSITY OF NEBRASKA
Program No. 959 - Nursing and Allied Health Residential Facilities
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
GENERAL FUND 250,000 -0- 15,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 250,000 -0- 15,000,000
(1) There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$250,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $-0- General Funds for a study
relating to design and construction of residential facilities for students in
nursing and allied health professions in Norfolk, Nebraska.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide annual appropriations
for the purpose of designing and constructing residential facilities for
students in nursing and allied health professions in Norfolk, Nebraska,
beginning in FY2027-28 in the amount of $750,000 per fiscal year for twenty
years.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Board of Regents may
enter into long-term financing contracts with any person, firm, or corporation
for the project pursuant to sections 85-401 to 85-411.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that future appropriations for the
facilities described in this section shall not be reduced until all contracts
and securities relating to the construction and financing of facilities are
completed or paid, but in no case shall such appropriations extend beyond the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2047.
Sec. 199. AGENCY NO. 52 — NEBRASKA STATE FAIR BOARD
Program No. 694 - State Fair Support and Improvement
-48-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 5,000,000 5,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,000,000 5,000,000
Cash Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amount shown.
Sec. 200. AGENCY NO. 53 — REAL PROPERTY APPRAISER BOARD
Program No. 79 - Appraiser Licensing
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 486,797 502,236
PROGRAM TOTAL 486,797 502,236
SALARY LIMIT 254,355 262,040
It is the intent of the Legislature that the agency complies with the
provisions of sections 76-2226 and 76-3219 on the allowed use of money in the
Real Property Appraiser Fund and the Appraisal Management Company Fund.
Sec. 201. AGENCY NO. 54 — NEBRASKA STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Program No. 561 - Semiquincentennial Commission
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 20,000 20,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 20,000 20,000
Sec. 202. AGENCY NO. 54 — NEBRASKA STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Program No. 648 - Nebraska State Historical Society
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 5,286,038 5,286,038
CASH FUND 3,225,382 3,485,799
FEDERAL FUND est. 987,580 1,030,275
PROGRAM TOTAL 9,499,000 9,802,112
SALARY LIMIT 5,108,247 5,108,247
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 43 - Departmental Administration
No. 258 - Library/Archives Division
No. 541 - Museum Operation
No. 542 - Branch Museums
No. 543 - Archeology Division
No. 552 - Historic Preservation
No. 632 - Hall of Fame Commission
No. 647 - Skeletal Remains Protection
No. 653 - Gerald R. Ford Conservation Center
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$100,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $100,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$25,000 General Funds and for FY2026-27 $25,000 General Funds to carry out
obligations of the agency under the Unmarked Human Burial Sites and Skeletal
Remains Protection Act, which shall only be used for such purpose.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Nebraska State Historical
Society shall continue to budget and account for each of the branch museums at
the subprogram level within this program.
Appropriations shall only be expended for the operation, construction,
maintenance, or repair of a gift of real property after that property has been
approved for acceptance by the Governor and the Legislature as required under
section 81-1,113.
Sec. 203. AGENCY NO. 56 — NEBRASKA WHEAT DEVELOPMENT, UTILIZATION, AND
MARKETING BOARD
Program No. 381 - Nebraska Wheat Development, Utilization, and Marketing
Board
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,697,031 1,709,812
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,697,031 1,709,812
-49-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
SALARY LIMIT 304,107 313,126
Sec. 204. AGENCY NO. 57 — NEBRASKA OIL AND GAS CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Program No. 335 - Oil and Gas Conservation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND -0- -0-
CASH FUND 1,434,241 1,471,352
FEDERAL FUND est. 87,133 89,360
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,521,374 1,560,712
SALARY LIMIT 948,294 978,150
Sec. 205. AGENCY NO. 58 — BOARD OF ENGINEERS AND ARCHITECTS
Program No. 82 - Enforcement of Standards - Engineers and Architects
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 993,075 1,025,208
PROGRAM TOTAL 993,075 1,025,208
SALARY LIMIT 516,562 531,956
Sec. 206. AGENCY NO. 59 — BOARD OF GEOLOGISTS
Program No. 159 - Enforcement of Standards - Geologists
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 35,324 35,892
PROGRAM TOTAL 35,324 35,892
Sec. 207. AGENCY NO. 60 — NEBRASKA ETHANOL BOARD
Program No. 516 - Ethanol
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 872,078 891,276
PROGRAM TOTAL 872,078 891,276
SALARY LIMIT 313,063 324,845
Sec. 208. AGENCY NO. 61 — NEBRASKA DAIRY INDUSTRY DEVELOPMENT BOARD
Program No. 114 - Nebraska Dairy Industry Development Board
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,640,000 1,640,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,640,000 1,640,000
Sec. 209. AGENCY NO. 62 — STATE BOARD OF EXAMINERS FOR LAND SURVEYORS
Program No. 83 - Enforcement of Standards - Land Surveyors
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 30,874 30,874
PROGRAM TOTAL 30,874 30,874
Sec. 210. AGENCY NO. 63 — NEBRASKA STATE BOARD OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY
Program No. 84 - Enforcement of Standards - Public Accountancy
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 496,109 507,807
PROGRAM TOTAL 496,109 507,807
SALARY LIMIT 255,947 263,456
Sec. 211. AGENCY NO. 64 — NEBRASKA STATE PATROL
Program No. 100 - Public Protection
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 89,325,513 89,325,513
CASH FUND 10,405,534 10,332,992
-50-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FEDERAL FUND est. 1,032,003 1,177,933
PROGRAM TOTAL 100,763,050 100,836,438
SALARY LIMIT 59,391,534 60,834,142
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 189 - Command and Support
No. 190 - Criminal Investigations
No. 195 - Road Operations
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$150,000 General Funds and $100,000 Federal Funds from the Byrne Criminal
History Improvement set-aside funds, subject to available federal
appropriation, which shall only be expended for criminal justice information
systems improvements. There is included in the appropriation to this program
for FY2026-27 $150,000 General Funds and $100,000 Federal Funds from the Byrne
Criminal History Improvement set-aside funds, subject to available federal
appropriation, which shall only be expended for criminal justice information
systems improvements. Federal Funds transferred to the Nebraska State Patrol
pursuant to this section shall be expended consistent with all applicable
federal laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to Byrne Criminal History
Improvement set-aside funds.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$489,979 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $489,979 Cash Funds, which appropriation
amounts shall only be expended to provide law enforcement coverage along state
road construction zones. The Department of Transportation shall contract with
the Nebraska State Patrol for such law enforcement coverage and shall pay for
such services from the Roads Operations Cash Fund to the Nebraska State Patrol
Cash Fund in four equal quarterly amounts to be transferred by the State
Treasurer on or before July 15, October 15, January 15, and April 15, for both
FY2025-26 and FY2026-27.
Sec. 212. AGENCY NO. 64 — NEBRASKA STATE PATROL
Program No. 205 - Carrier Enforcement
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 13,382,582 13,710,157
FEDERAL FUND est. 4,072,054 4,220,536
PROGRAM TOTAL 17,454,636 17,930,693
SALARY LIMIT 11,103,091 11,335,154
Sec. 213. AGENCY NO. 64 — NEBRASKA STATE PATROL
Program No. 325 - Operational Improvements
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,900,380 1,893,380
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,900,380 1,893,380
SALARY LIMIT 53,400 53,440
Expenditures from this program shall be restricted to the Public Safety
Cash Fund, the Treasury Agency Forfeitures Cash Fund, and the Nebraska State
Patrol Drug Control and Education Cash Fund. These Cash Funds shall not be
expended from any other budget programs, except that the Public Safety Cash
Fund may also be expended from administratively created budget Program No. 575,
for the purpose of providing the required state match for federal Byrne grants
awarded to the Nebraska State Patrol and from Program No. 850 for the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System. Expenditures from these two Cash Funds
shall be made from separate budget subprograms.
As funds become available, the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and
Public Safety shall submit proposed lists of projects in writing to the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services, which shall forward them
to the Governor for approval or rejection, except that no new projects shall be
submitted by the superintendent or approved by the Governor during FY2025-26 or
FY2026-27 until the Nebraska State Patrol has first reserved the full Cash Fund
appropriations and Cash Fund balances necessary to completely meet all active
and outstanding operational improvement project balances remaining unexpended
as of June 30, 2025.
Sec. 214. AGENCY NO. 64 — NEBRASKA STATE PATROL
Program No. 630 - State Capitol Security
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 294,568 294,568
-51-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
REVOLVING FUND 1,986,146 2,052,504
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,280,714 2,347,072
SALARY LIMIT 1,318,550 1,353,911
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Any security agreements entered into by the Nebraska State Patrol, on
behalf of the state capitol security division, shall require that all such
revenue be credited directly to the Capitol Security Revolving Fund.
For budgeting purposes only, the amount of projected revenue to be
received from security agreements entered into by the Nebraska State Patrol, on
behalf of the state capitol security division, to be credited directly to the
Capitol Security Revolving Fund is estimated to be $532,460 for FY2025-26 and
$532,460 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 215. AGENCY NO. 64 — NEBRASKA STATE PATROL
Program No. 850 - Nebraska Public Safety Communication System
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,119,592 1,119,592
CASH FUND 5,976,771 5,575,496
PROGRAM TOTAL 7,096,363 6,695,088
SALARY LIMIT 251,250 257,968
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 216. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 49 - Departmental Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
REVOLVING FUND 4,869,272 5,023,675
PROGRAM TOTAL 4,869,272 5,023,675
SALARY LIMIT 3,025,193 3,106,128
Sec. 217. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 171 - Materiel Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 98,711 98,711
REVOLVING FUND 19,008,499 19,342,886
PROGRAM TOTAL 19,107,210 19,441,597
SALARY LIMIT 3,903,389 3,994,293
Sec. 218. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 174 - OCIO Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
REVOLVING FUND 133,742,982 135,160,597
PROGRAM TOTAL 133,742,982 135,160,597
SALARY LIMIT 32,681,705 33,767,981
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this agency for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 according to the
following program classifications:
No. 101 - Chief Information Officer
No. 170 - Statewide Computer Network
No. 172 - Information Management Services
No. 173 - Communications Division
No. 245 - Public Safety Communications System
Sec. 219. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 180 - Transportation Services Bureau
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
REVOLVING FUND 11,987,494 12,303,907
PROGRAM TOTAL 11,987,494 12,303,907
-52-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
SALARY LIMIT 690,397 710,222
Sec. 220. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 509 - Budget Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,990,412 1,990,412
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,990,412 1,990,412
SALARY LIMIT 1,489,461 1,536,345
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 221. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 535 - Risk Management Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
REVOLVING FUND 537,315 547,513
PROGRAM TOTAL 537,315 547,513
SALARY LIMIT 223,667 227,870
Sec. 222. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 560 - State Building Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 230,055 230,055
CASH FUND 933,457 933,457
REVOLVING FUND 93,376,511 53,804,745
PROGRAM TOTAL 94,540,023 54,968,257
SALARY LIMIT 8,931,004 9,140,423
Charges assessed by the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
provisions of subdivision (4)(b) of section 81-1108.17 for the Ferguson House
shall not annually exceed an amount calculated as follows:
(1) Multiply the insured replacement value of the Ferguson House property
by two one-hundredths;
(2) Divide the amount of tenant-occupied gross square feet of Ferguson
House space by the Ferguson House gross square feet of total space; and
(3) Multiply the amount computed in subdivision (1) of this section by the
amount computed in subdivision (2) of this section.
Sec. 223. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 567 - Accounting Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
REVOLVING FUND 11,390,051 11,545,795
PROGRAM TOTAL 11,390,051 11,545,795
SALARY LIMIT 3,318,818 3,412,200
Sec. 224. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 573 - Task Force for Building Renewal
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 598,814 610,199
PROGRAM TOTAL 598,814 610,199
SALARY LIMIT 422,347 430,503
Sec. 225. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 591 - Tort Claims
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 210,000 210,000
CASH FUND 170,000 170,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 380,000 380,000
(1) The following amounts are hereby transferred to the Tort Claims Fund
from the respective agency fund balances:
-53-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
(a) $797 from the Nebraska Brand Committee;
(b) $4,487 from the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(c) $22,691 from the Game and Parks Commission;
(d) $30,934 from the Department of Transportation; and
(e) $660 from the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges.
Such sum shall be transferred to the risk management and state claims
division no later than August 1, 2025, or in four equal payments on August 1,
October 1, January 1, and April 1, at the discretion of the Risk Manager.
(2) The following amounts are hereby transferred to the Tort Claims Fund
from the respective agency fund balances:
(a) $797 from the Nebraska Brand Committee;
(b) $4,487 from the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(c) $22,691 from the Game and Parks Commission;
(d) $30,934 from the Department of Transportation; and
(e) $660 from the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges.
Such sum shall be transferred to the risk management and state claims
division no later than August 1, 2026, or in four equal payments on August 1,
October 1, January 1, and April 1, at the discretion of the Risk Manager.
It is the intent of the Legislature that transfers specified in this
section for FY2026-27 be adjusted by the One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second
Session, 2026, in accordance with information available after July 1, 2025.
Sec. 226. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 592 - Indemnification Claims
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 750,000 750,000
REVOLVING FUND 150,000 150,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 900,000 900,000
Sec. 227. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 593 - Workers' Compensation Claims
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
REVOLVING FUND 22,952,296 22,952,296
PROGRAM TOTAL 22,952,296 22,952,296
It is the intent of the Legislature that state agencies, boards, and
commissions make the workers' compensation insurance premium payments to the
Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund, which are hereby appropriated for
FY2025-26 in this program under the authority of sections 81-8,239.02 and
81-8,239.03, to the risk management and state claims division no later than
August 1, 2025, or in four equal payments on August 1, October 1, January 1,
and April 1, at the discretion of the Risk Manager.
It is the intent of the Legislature that state agencies, boards, and
commissions make the workers' compensation insurance premium payments to the
Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund, which are hereby appropriated for
FY2026-27 in this program under the authority of sections 81-8,239.02 and
81-8,239.03, to the risk management and state claims division no later than
August 1, 2026, or in four equal payments on August 1, October 1, January 1,
and April 1, at the discretion of the Risk Manager.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26 an
amount not to exceed $25,000 Revolving Funds, which may be used to contract for
rehabilitation services to assist worker rehabilitation in relation to workers'
compensation cases. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 an amount not to exceed $25,000 Revolving Funds, which may be used to
contract for rehabilitation services to assist worker rehabilitation in
relation to workers' compensation cases.
Sec. 228. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 594 - State Insurance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
REVOLVING FUND 13,544,411 13,544,411
PROGRAM TOTAL 13,544,411 13,544,411
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 229. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 605 - Personnel Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,592,263 1,592,263
REVOLVING FUND 9,549,565 9,549,565
PROGRAM TOTAL 11,141,828 11,141,828
-54-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
SALARY LIMIT 8,303,408 8,343,835
Sec. 230. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 606 - Benefits Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 2,742,818 2,768,803
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,742,818 2,768,803
SALARY LIMIT 402,096 414,419
Sec. 231. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 608 - Employee Relations Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 379,680 382,204
PROGRAM TOTAL 379,680 382,204
SALARY LIMIT 279,721 289,634
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 232. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 685 - Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 5,198,748 5,525,427
CASH FUND 60,243 60,243
REVOLVING FUND 4,750 4,750
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,263,741 5,590,420
SALARY LIMIT 1,887,562 1,935,952
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated. It is the intent of the Legislature that any
reappropriated balance, other than Capitol Heating, Ventilating, and Air
Conditioning Systems Replacement project manager reappropriation, be used for
unexpected increases in utility expenses.
Sec. 233. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 901 - State Capitol Improvements
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
CASH FUND -0- 1,000,000 9,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- 1,000,000 9,000,000
The Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission is hereby authorized to
complete projects for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of the
State Capitol and its grounds as outlined in section 72-2211.
Sec. 234. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 922 - Capitol Heating, Ventilating, and Air Conditioning
Systems Replacement
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
NEBRASKA CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION FUND 33,333,886 -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 33,333,886 -0- -0-
The Legislature hereby acknowledges and reaffirms the directive made by
Laws 2014, LB905, which authorizes the Office of the Nebraska Capitol
Commission to continue planning for and undertake replacement of the existing
heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems serving the Nebraska State
Capitol as well as associated infrastructure, fire protection, life safety, and
architectural improvements identified in the Nebraska State Capitol HVAC Master
Plan Amendment, dated September 20, 2013. The total project cost, including the
appropriation in Program number 685 for the Capitol Heating, Ventilating, and
Air Conditioning Systems Replacement project manager, shall not exceed
$158,743,113.
Sec. 235. AGENCY NO. 65 — DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Program No. 940 - Task Force for Building Renewal
FY2025-26 FY2026-27 FUTURE
-55-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
CASH FUND 21,273,930 21,273,930 42,547,860
PROGRAM TOTAL 21,273,930 21,273,930 42,547,860
The Legislature hereby acknowledges and reaffirms the directive made by
section 77-2602, which is to place amounts from the special privilege tax on
cigarettes in the Building Renewal Allocation Fund for FY1997-98 and continuing
each fiscal year until all the purposes of the Deferred Building Renewal Act
have been fulfilled. The Legislature hereby further acknowledges and reaffirms
directives made by sections 81-188.01, 81-188.03, and 81-188.05 to utilize
amounts from certain depreciation charges credited to the State Building
Renewal Assessment Fund, University Building Renewal Assessment Fund, and State
College Building Renewal Assessment Fund for purposes as provided in the
Deferred Building Renewal Act.
The appropriation to this program is for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of the Deferred Building Renewal Act, which includes deferred
repair, fire and life safety projects, and compliance with the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) of 1990. Funds may also be spent on
projects related to energy conservation. There is hereby appropriated any
available federal funds, plus investment income thereon, for this program for
FY2025-26 and FY2026-27. There is included in the appropriation to this program
for FY2025-26 an amount not to exceed $200,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 an
amount not to exceed $200,000 Cash Funds for building maintenance and renewal
training, roof scans and other testing procedures, and consulting work.
The funds appropriated in this section for actual deferred repair, fire
and life safety, compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of
1990, and energy conservation shall be matched by federal, private, and agency
General, Cash, and Revolving Funds as determined by the Task Force for Building
Renewal.
None of the funds appropriated to this program shall be used for operating
budget compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.
Expenditures for deferred repair, fire and life safety projects, and compliance
with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 may be made through
the same program on the Allotment Status Report in the Nebraska Information
System, except that expenditures for deferred repair, fire and life safety
projects, and compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of
1990 shall each be kept separate by subprogram on the Budget Status Report in
the Nebraska Information System or through the use of the Grant Project Status
Report or some other accounting mechanism.
Sec. 236. AGENCY NO. 66 — ABSTRACTERS BOARD OF EXAMINERS
Program No. 58 - Enforcement of Standards - Abstracters
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 56,266 56,266
PROGRAM TOTAL 56,266 56,266
SALARY LIMIT 32,066 32,066
Sec. 237. AGENCY NO. 67 — EQUAL OPPORTUNITY COMMISSION
Program No. 59 - Enforcement of Standards
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,500,988 1,547,076
FEDERAL FUND est. 1,107,432 1,150,189
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,608,420 2,697,265
SALARY LIMIT 1,687,153 1,787,215
Sec. 238. AGENCY NO. 68 — COMMISSION ON LATINO-AMERICANS
Program No. 537 - Commission on Latino-Americans
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 304,402 309,869
CASH FUND 5,000 5,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 309,402 314,869
SALARY LIMIT 212,590 216,015
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 239. AGENCY NO. 69 — NEBRASKA ARTS COUNCIL
Program No. 326 - Promotion and Development of the Arts
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-56-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
GENERAL FUND 819,150 850,377
CASH FUND 60,000 60,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 220,702 220,702
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,099,852 1,131,079
SALARY LIMIT 724,958 744,035
Sec. 240. AGENCY NO. 69 — NEBRASKA ARTS COUNCIL
Program No. 327 - Aid to the Arts
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,849,209 1,849,209
CASH FUND 325,000 325,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 545,800 545,800
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,720,009 2,720,009
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,849,209 General Funds, $314,000 Cash Funds, and $545,800 Federal Funds
estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,849,209 General
Funds, $314,000 Cash Funds, and $545,800 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program $943,863
General Funds for FY2025-26 and $943,863 General Funds for FY2026-27 for a
competitive grant program as provided for in subdivision (1)(h) of section
82-313.
Sec. 241. AGENCY NO. 69 — NEBRASKA ARTS COUNCIL
Program No. 329 - Arts and Humanities Preservation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,449,763 1,449,763
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,449,763 1,449,763
SALARY LIMIT 46,289 46,289
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,372,500 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,372,500
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall
only allot state aid funds appropriated to this program if the Nebraska Arts
Council provides evidence of dollar-for-dollar matching funds derived from
nonstate sources, as required in section 82-332.
Sec. 242. AGENCY NO. 70 — FOSTER CARE REVIEW OFFICE
Program No. 116 - Foster Care Review Office
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,704,985 2,821,679
CASH FUND 5,700 5,700
FEDERAL FUND est. 521,561 521,561
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,232,246 3,348,940
SALARY LIMIT 2,127,490 2,193,832
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 243. AGENCY NO. 70 — FOSTER CARE REVIEW OFFICE
Program No. 317 - Court Appointed Special Advocate State Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 500,000 500,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 500,000 500,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$500,000 General Funds for court appointed special advocate state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $500,000 General Funds for court appointed special
advocate state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 244. AGENCY NO. 70 — FOSTER CARE REVIEW OFFICE
-57-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Program No. 353 - Nebraska Children's Commission
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 217,388 226,307
PROGRAM TOTAL 217,388 226,307
SALARY LIMIT 128,169 132,203
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$217,388 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $226,307 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund.
Sec. 245. AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Program No. 601 - Community and Rural Development
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 7,294,942 6,294,942
CASH FUND 36,575,991 21,671,030
FEDERAL FUND est. 54,572,337 54,632,192
PROGRAM TOTAL 98,443,270 82,598,164
SALARY LIMIT 3,330,071 3,381,786
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$6,580,762 General Funds, $33,726,860 Cash Funds, and $50,530,110 Federal Funds
estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $5,580,762 General
Funds, $19,023,140 Cash Funds, and $50,530,110 Federal Funds estimate for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$250,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $-0- Cash Funds from the Middle Income
Workforce Housing Investment Fund to conduct a study regarding prefabricated
housing in Nebraska.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for FY2025-26 $700,000
General Funds to provide aid funding to development districts formed under
sections 13-1901 to 13-1907. There is included in the amount shown as aid for
FY2026-27 $700,000 General Funds to provide aid funding to development
districts formed under sections 13-1901 to 13-1907.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for FY2025-26 $4,880,762
General Funds to provide aid for mentorship programs for nonprofit
organizations that meet eligibility requirements designed by the Department of
Economic Development to improve reading levels for elementary students. There
is included in the amount shown as aid for FY2026-27 $4,880,762 General Funds
to provide aid for mentorship programs for nonprofit organizations that meet
eligibility requirements designed by the Department of Economic Development to
improve reading levels for elementary students.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for FY2025-26 $1,000,000
General Funds and for FY2026-27 $-0- General Funds for the grant authorized in
section 81-1213.04, which shall only be used for such purpose.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance for unexpended obligations
existing on June 30, 2025, for the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Act, the
Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act, the Nebraska Affordable Housing
Act, and the Nebraska Rural Projects Act, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 246. AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Program No. 603 - Industrial Recruitment
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 15,718,538 15,805,071
CASH FUND 33,019,625 7,525,784
FEDERAL FUND est. 21,183,754 21,188,298
PROGRAM TOTAL 69,921,917 44,519,153
SALARY LIMIT 4,603,821 4,733,987
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance for unexpended obligations
existing on June 30, 2025, for the Site and Building Development Act, is hereby
reappropriated.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$11,020,352 General Funds, $31,839,197 Cash Funds, and $20,737,571 Federal
Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $11,020,352
General Funds, $6,339,197 Cash Funds, and $20,737,571 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate an additional
$4,500,000 Cash Funds from the Site and Building Development Fund in FY2027-28
-58-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
pursuant to subdivision (1)(h) of section 81-12,147.
Sec. 247. AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Program No. 604 - Business Incentives
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,460,522 2,460,522
CASH FUND 54,000,000 50,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 56,460,522 52,460,522
SALARY LIMIT 1,329,007 1,329,007
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$50,000,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Transformational Project Fund as state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $50,000,000 Cash Funds from the
Nebraska Transformational Project Fund as state aid, which shall only be used
for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$4,000,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $-0- Cash Funds from the ImagiNE
Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 248. AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Program No. 611 - Economic Recovery
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 31,318,519 31,378,477
PROGRAM TOTAL 31,318,519 31,378,477
SALARY LIMIT 2,624,620 2,658,678
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$27,448,770 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$27,448,770 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated. The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance
existing on June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
The unexpended Federal Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, from funds allocated to the State of Nebraska from the United States
Economic Development Administration's American Rescue Plan Travel, Tourism and
Outdoor Recreation program, is hereby reappropriated. The unexpended Federal
Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025, from funds allocated to
the State of Nebraska from the federal Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund
pursuant to the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, 42 U.S.C. 804, is
hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 249. AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Program No. 655 - Civic and Community Center Financing Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 5,525,261 5,531,441
PROGRAM TOTAL 5,525,261 5,531,441
SALARY LIMIT 87,232 90,646
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$5,397,775 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $5,397,775
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 250. AGENCY NO. 73 — STATE BOARD OF LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTS
Program No. 597 - State Board of Landscape Architects
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 35,618 36,347
PROGRAM TOTAL 35,618 36,347
Sec. 251. AGENCY NO. 74 — NEBRASKA POWER REVIEW BOARD
Program No. 72 - Enforcement of Standards
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 786,844 808,516
-59-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
PROGRAM TOTAL 786,844 808,516
SALARY LIMIT 327,466 339,282
Sec. 252. AGENCY NO. 75 — NEBRASKA INVESTMENT COUNCIL
Program No. 610 - Investments Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 3,879,362 3,980,063
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,879,362 3,980,063
SALARY LIMIT 1,596,088 1,666,657
Sec. 253. AGENCY NO. 76 — COMMISSION ON INDIAN AFFAIRS
Program No. 584 - Commission on Indian Affairs
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 306,012 316,970
CASH FUND 60,000 60,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 366,012 376,970
SALARY LIMIT 212,850 218,179
Sec. 254. AGENCY NO. 77 — COMMISSION OF INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS
Program No. 490 - Commissioner Expenses
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 64,331 64,331
PROGRAM TOTAL 64,331 64,331
SALARY LIMIT 58,000 58,000
Sec. 255. AGENCY NO. 77 — COMMISSION OF INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS
Program No. 531 - Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 277,064 283,877
PROGRAM TOTAL 277,064 283,877
SALARY LIMIT 176,502 182,031
Sec. 256. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 150 - Juvenile Services Act
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 714,488 718,740
PROGRAM TOTAL 714,488 718,740
SALARY LIMIT 84,536 87,197
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$564,300 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$564,300 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance, less aid, existing on
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 257. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 155 - County Juvenile Services Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 6,882,316 6,899,937
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,882,316 6,899,937
SALARY LIMIT 295,189 304,481
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$5,798,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$5,798,000 General Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
-60-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
purpose.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance, less aid, existing on
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 258. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 198 - Central Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 620,939 645,212
CASH FUND 51,948 54,053
FEDERAL FUND est. 5,605,606 5,630,099
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,278,493 6,329,364
SALARY LIMIT 884,973 912,835
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$4,520,673 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $4,520,673 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$327,736 General Funds to operate a victim notification system, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $327,736 General Funds to operate a victim notification
system, which shall only be used for such purpose.
The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall
administratively transfer Salary Limits among Programs 150, 155, 198, 201, 215,
and 220 within Agency 78, upon written certification by the executive director
that the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice has
determined that such transfer is necessary for the efficient functioning of
agency operations.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance, less aid, existing on
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 259. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 199 - Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 5,730,935 5,795,377
CASH FUND 630,838 646,007
FEDERAL FUND est. 75,532 75,965
PROGRAM TOTAL 6,437,305 6,517,349
SALARY LIMIT 1,369,250 1,414,039
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, less $8,000,000, is hereby reappropriated.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$855,258 General Funds for Training Center building rental charges to be paid
to the state building division of the Department of Administrative Services,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $855,258 General Funds for Training
Center building rental charges to be paid to the state building division of the
Department of Administrative Services, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$344,748 General Funds for the annual depreciation charge to be paid to the
state building division of the Department of Administrative Services, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $344,748 General Funds for the annual depreciation
charge to be paid to the state building division of the Department of
Administrative Services, which shall only be used for such purpose.
All food service charges for students shall be separate and distinct from
tuition and fee charges assessed, and such food service charges shall not be
included or commingled for purposes of establishing annual tuition and fee
rates.
Any rules, regulations, or operating instructions adopted by the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall be consistent with the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 260. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 201 - Victim-Witness Assistance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-61-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
GENERAL FUND 178,196 179,963
FEDERAL FUND est. 12,623,735 12,657,243
PROGRAM TOTAL 12,801,931 12,837,206
SALARY LIMIT 601,548 620,486
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$50,457 General Funds and $11,172,294 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $50,457 General Funds and
$11,172,294 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance, less aid, existing on
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 261. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 202 - Crime Victims' Reparations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 27,161 27,296
CASH FUND 445,689 448,362
FEDERAL FUND est. 128,631 128,742
PROGRAM TOTAL 601,481 604,400
SALARY LIMIT 49,434 50,991
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$19,200 General Funds, $353,474 Cash Funds, and $121,980 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in
the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $19,200 General Funds, $353,474
Cash Funds, and $121,980 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only
be used for such purpose.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance, less aid, existing on
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 262. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 203 - Jail Standards Board
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 450,582 466,107
CASH FUND -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL 450,582 466,107
SALARY LIMIT 288,731 297,819
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 263. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 204 - Office of Violence Prevention
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 751,364 755,010
CASH FUND 35,726 35,941
PROGRAM TOTAL 787,090 790,951
SALARY LIMIT 94,655 97,634
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$591,160 General Funds and $25,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only
be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $591,160 General Funds and $25,000 Cash Funds for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance, less aid, existing on
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 264. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 210 - State Agency Byrne Grants
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-62-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
FEDERAL FUND est. 1,329,951 1,329,951
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,329,951 1,329,951
SALARY LIMIT -0- -0-
The budget division of the Department of Administrative Services shall
create a separate budget program within each agency receiving funds from the
appropriation to this program to properly account for such funds. The
expenditure limitation for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems may
be increased within these administratively created programs to allow for the
expenditure of personal services.
At the direction of the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services, any funds appropriated to this program
shall be administratively transferred to the appropriate state agencies that
have been awarded federal Byrne grants by the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice. The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice shall certify to the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services the federal fund appropriations to be transferred
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 265. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 215 - Criminal Justice Information System
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 249,875 257,623
FEDERAL FUND est. 631,553 637,673
PROGRAM TOTAL 881,428 895,296
SALARY LIMIT 235,746 243,166
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Funds appropriated to this program shall be used to support criminal
justice information systems projects for state law enforcement agencies and to
assist with the sharing of criminal justice information by federal, state, and
local agencies.
Sec. 266. AGENCY NO. 78 — NEBRASKA COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Program No. 220 - Community Corrections Division
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 153,924 156,643
CASH FUND 644,913 649,134
PROGRAM TOTAL 798,837 805,777
SALARY LIMIT 144,747 149,302
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 267. AGENCY NO. 81 — COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED
Program No. 357 - Blind and Visually Impaired
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 3,152,899 3,429,388
CASH FUND 148,746 148,746
FEDERAL FUND est. 4,512,243 4,512,243
PROGRAM TOTAL 7,813,888 8,090,377
SALARY LIMIT 3,796,989 3,916,581
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$381,871 General Funds, $10,000 Cash Funds, and $916,189 Federal Funds estimate
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in
the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $381,871 General Funds, $10,000
Cash Funds, and $916,189 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only
be used for such purpose.
Sec. 268. AGENCY NO. 82 — COMMISSION FOR THE DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING
Program No. 578 - Deaf and Hard of Hearing
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,264,949 1,312,784
-63-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
CASH FUND 36,600 36,600
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,301,549 1,349,384
SALARY LIMIT 858,117 885,131
Sec. 269. AGENCY NO. 83 — AID TO COMMUNITY COLLEGES
Program No. 151 - Aid to Community Colleges
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 119,116,711 119,116,711
PROGRAM TOTAL 119,116,711 119,116,711
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$111,054,477 General Funds for general state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose and which shall be distributed to community college areas pursuant
to the Community College Aid Act. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $111,054,477 General Funds for general state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose and which shall be distributed to
community college areas pursuant to the Community College Aid Act.
There is also included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$8,062,234 General Funds for state aid for dual enrollment, which shall only be
used for such purpose. There is also included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $8,062,234 General Funds for state aid for dual
enrollment, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Appropriations for dual enrollment shall be distributed to community
college areas in direct proportion to the most recent available three-year
average full-time-equivalent enrollment in dual credit courses delivered by the
respective community college areas based upon dual enrollment credit hour
enrollment data reported to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education by the respective community college areas.
For purposes of this section, dual enrollment course means a course
delivered to high school students for whom credit shall be reported on the
student's postsecondary educational institution transcript. It is the intent of
the Legislature that amounts distributed to each community college area in
proportion to enrollment in dual credit courses be applied to support
discounting of tuition assessed for enrollment in such courses.
Sec. 270. AGENCY NO. 83 — AID TO COMMUNITY COLLEGES
Program No. 152 - Community College Levy Reduction
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND est. 265,988,849 279,288,291
PROGRAM TOTAL 265,988,849 279,288,291
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$265,988,849 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $279,288,291 Cash Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Cash Fund expenditures for this program shall not be limited to the
amounts shown and shall be no greater than the amount certified pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 85-1543.
Sec. 271. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 106 - Energy Office Administration
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,096,962 1,099,821
FEDERAL FUND est. 13,639,412 13,685,125
PROGRAM TOTAL 14,736,374 14,784,946
SALARY LIMIT 1,502,581 1,531,909
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$564,562 Cash Funds and $11,788,428 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $564,562 Cash Funds and $11,788,428 Federal Funds
estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 272. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 304 - Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 2,050,000 2,050,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,050,000 2,050,000
The unexpended General Fund and Cash Fund appropriation balance
-64-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
appropriated to the Department of Natural Resources for this program existing
on June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment for this program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$2,050,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $2,050,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 273. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 306 - Water Well Decommissioning
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 70,000 70,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 70,000 70,000
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance appropriated to the
Department of Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for
this program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$70,000 Cash Funds, plus any reappropriated amounts, for state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $70,000 Cash Funds, plus any reappropriated amounts, for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 274. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 307 - Nebraska Resources Development Fund
The unexpended General Fund and Cash Fund appropriation balances
appropriated to the Department of Natural Resources for this program existing
on June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment for this program.
Sec. 275. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 309 - Natural Resources Water Quality Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,187,500 1,187,500
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,187,500 1,187,500
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance appropriated to the
Department of Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for
this program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,187,500 Cash Funds plus any reappropriated amounts, for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $1,187,500 Cash Funds plus any reappropriated
amounts, for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 276. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 313 - Water Sustainability Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND -0- -0-
PROGRAM TOTAL -0- -0-
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance appropriated to the
Department of Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for
this program.
Sec. 277. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 314 - Critical Infrastructure Facilities
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance appropriated to the
Department of Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for
this program.
Sec. 278. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 319 - Water Projects
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 65,300,000 62,800,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 65,300,000 62,800,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$62,800,000 Cash Funds from the Perkins County Canal Project Fund. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $62,800,000 Cash
Funds from the Perkins County Canal Project Fund.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$2,500,000 Cash Funds from the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance appropriated to the
Department of Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30, 2025,
-65-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
from the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund is hereby reappropriated
to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for this program.
Sec. 279. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 334 - Soil and Water Conservation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 10,708,426 10,758,426
CASH FUND 9,573,272 9,614,357
FEDERAL FUND est. 2,207,789 2,273,709
PROGRAM TOTAL 22,489,487 22,646,492
SALARY LIMIT 8,618,370 8,639,688
There is hereby reappropriated an amount certified by the Department of
Water, Energy, and Environment to the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services of the unexpended General
Fund and Cash Fund appropriation balances appropriated to the Department of
Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30, 2025, that are
allocated in budget subprograms 19, 20, 21, and 24 of Program 334.
Reappropriated funds shall be allocated to the same budget subprogram.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,450,000 Cash Funds plus any reappropriated amounts and $5,000 Federal Funds
estimate, for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $7,450,000 Cash
Funds plus any reappropriated amounts and $5,000 Federal Funds estimate, for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance appropriated to the
Department of Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for
this program.
Sec. 280. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 513 - Environmental Quality
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 5,593,323 5,593,323
CASH FUND 42,816,431 43,115,996
FEDERAL FUND est. 45,798,301 46,175,320
PROGRAM TOTAL 94,208,055 94,884,639
SALARY LIMIT 18,821,791 19,216,295
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program
classifications:
No. 513 - Administration
No. 586 - Water Quality
No. 587 - Land Quality
No. 588 - Air Quality
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$18,645,601 Cash Funds and $24,538,513 Federal Funds estimate for state aid,
which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $18,645,601 Cash Funds and
$24,529,499 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance appropriated to the
Department of Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30, 2025, up
to $6,000,000, is hereby reappropriated for providing grants to metropolitan
utilities districts for lead service line replacements in accordance with
section 71-5328.
Sec. 281. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 523 - Wastewater Loan Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
FEDERAL FUND est. 9,089,000 9,089,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 9,089,000 9,089,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$9,089,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $9,089,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Funds set aside for grants to small communities shall not be commingled
with funds deposited in the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan
Fund.
-66-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Sec. 282. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 528 - Drinking Water Facilities Loan Fund
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
FEDERAL FUND est. 12,990,000 12,990,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 12,990,000 12,990,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$12,990,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $12,990,000 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
Sec. 283. AGENCY NO. 85 — PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT BOARD
Program No. 41 - Administration of Retirement Systems and Deferred
Compensation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 8,995,527 8,995,527
PROGRAM TOTAL 8,995,527 8,995,527
SALARY LIMIT 3,942,793 4,054,956
Sec. 284. AGENCY NO. 85 — PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT BOARD
Program No. 42 - Board Member Expenses
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 38,112 38,112
PROGRAM TOTAL 38,112 38,112
SALARY LIMIT 10,500 10,500
It is the intent of the Legislature that all expenses of the members of
the Public Employees Retirement Board, including conference registration
expenses, be paid exclusively from this program.
Sec. 285. AGENCY NO. 85 — PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT BOARD
Program No. 515 - Public Employees Retirement
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 36,444,018 18,112,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 36,444,018 18,112,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$17,541,637 General Funds to provide additional funding to the School Employees
Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$-0- General Funds to provide additional funding to the School Employees
Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$10,607,612 General Funds to provide additional funding to the Omaha School
Employees Retirement System, which shall only be used for such purpose. There
is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $10,600,000
General Funds to provide additional funding to the Omaha School Employees
Retirement System, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$6,834,870 General Funds to provide additional funding to the Nebraska State
Patrol Retirement System, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $6,000,000 General
Funds to provide additional funding to the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement
System, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,459,899 General Funds to provide additional funding to the Nebraska Judges
Retirement System, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included
in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,512,000 General Funds to
provide additional funding to the Nebraska Judges Retirement System, which
shall only be used for such purpose.
Pursuant to section 84-1319.01, each state agency participating in the
State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska shall contribute an
amount to the State Equal Retirement Benefit Fund to provide all similarly
situated male and female members with equal benefits. It is the intent of the
Legislature that the Public Employees Retirement Board notify each state agency
of the amount to be paid to the fund for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27.
Sec. 286. AGENCY NO. 86 — DRY BEAN COMMISSION
Program No. 137 - Dry Bean Commission
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
-67-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
CASH FUND 674,969 679,831
PROGRAM TOTAL 674,969 679,831
SALARY LIMIT 90,839 93,700
Sec. 287. AGENCY NO. 87 — NEBRASKA ACCOUNTABILITY AND DISCLOSURE
COMMISSION
Program No. 94 - Nebraska Political Accountability
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 704,672 594,602
CASH FUND 439,602 440,285
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,144,274 1,034,887
SALARY LIMIT 636,952 657,012
Sec. 288. AGENCY NO. 88 — CORN DEVELOPMENT, UTILIZATION, AND MARKETING
BOARD
Program No. 384 - Corn Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 19,825,520 19,849,028
PROGRAM TOTAL 19,825,520 19,849,028
SALARY LIMIT 597,558 616,368
Sec. 289. AGENCY NO. 90 — COMMISSION ON AFRICAN AMERICAN AFFAIRS
Program No. 863 - African American Commission
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 297,507 307,558
CASH FUND 25,000 25,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 322,507 332,558
SALARY LIMIT 196,083 202,160
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 290. AGENCY NO. 91 — NEBRASKA TOURISM COMMISSION
Program No. 618 - Tourism Promotion
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 10,139,826 10,195,565
PROGRAM TOTAL 10,139,826 10,195,565
SALARY LIMIT 1,133,536 1,169,219
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$852,600 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $852,600
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 291. AGENCY NO. 92 — GRAIN SORGHUM DEVELOPMENT, UTILIZATION, AND
MARKETING BOARD
Program No. 406 - Grain Sorghum Development
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 325,153 329,360
PROGRAM TOTAL 325,153 329,360
SALARY LIMIT 68,926 72,060
Sec. 292. AGENCY NO. 93 — TAX EQUALIZATION AND REVIEW COMMISSION
Program No. 115 - Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 592,997 617,285
CASH FUND 86,789 86,789
-68-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
PROGRAM TOTAL 679,786 704,074
SALARY LIMIT 372,491 382,585
Sec. 293. AGENCY NO. 94 — COMMISSION ON PUBLIC ADVOCACY
Program No. 425 - Operations
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 1,882,522 1,882,522
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,882,522 1,882,522
SALARY LIMIT 1,224,398 1,257,587
Sec. 294. AGENCY NO. 94 — COMMISSION ON PUBLIC ADVOCACY
Program No. 426 - Legal Services Aid
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 3,402,355 3,402,355
PROGRAM TOTAL 3,402,355 3,402,355
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$3,402,355 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $3,402,355
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 295. AGENCY NO. 94 — COMMISSION ON PUBLIC ADVOCACY
Program No. 429 - Civil Legal Services
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 290,000 290,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 290,000 290,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$290,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $290,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 296. AGENCY NO. 94 — COMMISSION ON PUBLIC ADVOCACY
Program No. 430 - Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 150,000 150,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 150,000 150,000
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$150,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $150,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 297. AGENCY NO. 94 — COMMISSION ON PUBLIC ADVOCACY
Program No. 455 - DNA Testing
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 75,000 75,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 75,000 75,000
Sec. 298. AGENCY NO. 95 — DRY PEA AND LENTIL COMMISSION
Program No. 862 - Dry Pea and Lentil Commission
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND 337,466 338,720
PROGRAM TOTAL 337,466 338,720
SALARY LIMIT 39,840 41,094
Sec. 299. AGENCY NO. 97 — COMMISSION ON ASIAN AMERICAN AFFAIRS
Program No. 866 - Asian American Commission
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 291,316 297,917
PROGRAM TOTAL 291,316 297,917
SALARY LIMIT 194,941 202,012
-69-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Sec. 300. CASH FUNDS.
The receipts for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 inuring to the several Cash
Funds, together with any amounts held in account by the State Treasurer on June
30, 2025, are hereby credited to each of the funds respectively.
Expenditure of Cash Funds appropriated in this act shall be limited to the
amount shown by program except when specific exceptions are made. The amounts
appropriated in this act include the following funds:
(1) Legislative Council: Nebraska Legislative Shared Information System
Cash Fund, Donations/Contributions Cash Fund, Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund,
Clerk of the Legislature Cash Fund, Biotechnology Development Cash Fund,
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund;
(2) Supreme Court: Supreme Court Reports Cash Fund, Court Appointed
Special Advocate Fund, Nebraska Statutes Distribution Cash Fund, Supreme Court
Attorney Services Cash Fund, Probation Program Cash Fund, Probation Cash Fund,
State Probation Contractual Services Cash Fund, Dispute Resolution Cash Fund,
Counsel for Discipline Cash Fund, Supreme Court Education Fund, Supreme Court
Automation Cash Fund, Parenting Act Fund, Public Guardianship Cash Fund,
Administrative Office of the Courts Cash Fund, Bar Commission Cash Fund;
(3) Governor: Governor's Policy Research Cash Fund;
(4) Secretary of State: Records Management Cash Fund, Secretary of State
Cash Fund, Election Administration Fund;
(5) Auditor of Public Accounts: Cooperative Audit Cash Fund;
(6) Attorney General: Motor Vehicle Fraud Cash Fund, Department of Justice
Natural Resources Enforcement Fund, State Settlement Cash Fund, Nebraska Health
Care Cash Fund, State Medicaid Fraud Control Unit Cash Fund;
(7) State Treasurer: State Treasurer Administrative Fund, Unclaimed
Property Cash Fund, Mutual Finance Assistance Fund, College Savings Plan
Administrative Fund, College Savings Plan Expense Fund, Convention Center
Support Fund, State Disbursement Unit Cash Fund, Treasury Management Cash Fund,
Sports Arena Facility Support Fund, Political Subdivision Recapture Cash Fund,
Inland Port Authority Fund, College Savings Incentive Cash Fund;
(8) State Department of Education: State Department of Education Cash
Fund, Certification Fund, School Technology Fund, Tuition Recovery Cash Fund,
Private Postsecondary Career Schools Cash Fund, School District Reorganization
Fund, Early Childhood Education Endowment Cash Fund, Nebraska Education
Improvement Fund, High School Equivalency Grant Fund, Expanded Learning
Opportunity Grant Fund, Education Future Fund, Behavioral Training Cash Fund,
Mental Health Training Cash Fund, College Pathway Program Cash Fund, School
Safety and Security Fund, Computer Science and Technology Education Fund;
(9) Public Service Commission: Nebraska Grain Warehouse Surveillance Cash
Fund, Nebraska Telecommunications Relay System Fund, Public Service Commission
Housing and Recreational Vehicle Cash Fund, Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund, Moisture Testing Examination Fund, Grain Warehouse
Auditing Fund, Municipal Rate Negotiations Revolving Loan Fund, Public Service
Commission Pipeline Regulation Fund, 911 Service System Fund, Transportation
Network Company Regulation Cash Fund, 211 Cash Fund;
(10) Department of Revenue: Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund, State
Lottery Operation Cash Fund, Marijuana and Controlled Substances Tax
Administration Cash Fund, Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fees
Collection Fund, Petroleum Release Remedial Action Collection Fund, Litter Fee
Collection Fund, Severance Tax Administration Fund, Charitable Gaming
Operations Fund, Tobacco Products Administration Cash Fund, Nebraska Incentives
Fund, Motor Fuel Tax Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund, Nebraska Health Care
Cash Fund, State Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund, Department of Revenue
Property Assessment Division Cash Fund, Property Tax Credit Cash Fund, Nebraska
Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act Cash Fund, Airline and
Carline Cash Fund, Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund, School District
Property Tax Relief Credit Fund;
(11) Department of Agriculture: Fertilizers and Soil Conditioners
Administrative Fund, Commercial Feed Administration Cash Fund, Pure Milk Cash
Fund, Soil and Plant Analysis Laboratory Cash Fund, Livestock Auction Market
Fund, Nebraska Potato Development Fund, Weights and Measures Administrative
Fund, Nebraska Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund,
Agricultural Products Marketing Information Cash Fund, Pure Food Cash Fund,
Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing Cash Fund, State Apiary Cash Fund,
Weed Book Cash Fund, Pesticide Administrative Cash Fund, Nebraska Seed
Administrative Cash Fund, Plant Protection and Plant Pest Cash Fund, Tractor
Permit Cash Fund, Nebraska Origin and Premium Quality Grain Cash Fund, Animal
Damage Control Cash Fund, Noxious Weed Cash Fund, Buffer Strip Incentive Fund,
Winery and Grape Producers Promotional Fund, Commercial Dog and Cat Operator
Inspection Program Cash Fund, Domesticated Cervine Animal Cash Fund,
Agricultural Laboratory Testing Services Cash Fund, Agricultural Suppliers
Lease Protection Cash Fund, Nebraska Beer Industry Promotional Fund, Animal
Health and Disease Control Act Cash Fund;
(12) Department of Banking and Finance: Financial Institution Assessment
Cash Fund, Securities Act Cash Fund, Department of Banking and Finance
Settlement Cash Fund;
(13) State Fire Marshal: Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Cash Fund,
State Fire Marshal Cash Fund, Underground Storage Tank Fund, Training Division
Cash Fund, Reduced Cigarette Ignition Propensity Fund, Boiler Inspection Cash
Fund, Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund;
(14) Department of Insurance: Department of Insurance Cash Fund;
(15) Department of Labor: Employment Security Special Contingent Fund,
-70-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund, Contractor and Professional Employer
Organization Registration Cash Fund, Sector Partnership Program Fund, Workforce
Development Program Cash Fund, Employment Security Administration Fund;
(16) Department of Motor Vehicles: Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund,
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund, Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition
Interlock Fund, License Plate Cash Fund, Vehicle Title and Registration System
Replacement and Maintenance Cash Fund, Operator's License Services Fund, System
Replacement and Maintenance Fund, Highway Tax Fund, Motor Carrier Services
System Replacement and Maintenance Fund;
(17) Department of Health and Human Services: Health and Human Services
Cash Fund, School District Reimbursement Fund, Nebraska Child Abuse Prevention
Fund, Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund, Childhood Care Cash Fund, University of
Nebraska Medical Center Medical Education Revolving Fund, Behavioral Health
Services Fund, Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund, Rural
Health Professional Incentive Fund, Organ and Tissue Donor Awareness and
Education Fund, Prescription Drug Monitoring Program Fund, ICF/DD Reimbursement
Protection Fund, Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund, Radiation
Transportation Emergency Response Cash Fund, Nursing Facility Quality Assurance
Fund, Health Care Homes for the Medically Underserved Fund, Nursing Faculty
Student Loan Cash Fund, Nursing Facility Penalty Cash Fund, Homeless Shelter
Assistance Trust Fund, Patient Safety Cash Fund, Medicaid Managed Care Excess
Profit Fund, HCBS Enhanced FMAP Fund, Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash
Fund, Opioid Prevention and Treatment Cash Fund;
(18) Department of Transportation: Highway Cash Fund, Grade Crossing
Protection Fund, State Recreation Road Fund, Roads Operations Cash Fund, State
Highway Capital Improvement Fund, Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund,
Aeronautics Cash Fund, Department of Transportation Aeronautics Capital
Improvement Fund;
(19) Department of Veterans' Affairs: Veteran Cemetery Construction Fund,
Nebraska Veteran Cemetery System Operation Fund, Department of Veterans'
Affairs Cash Fund, Veterans' Home Building Fund, Pets for Vets Cash Fund,
Veterans Employment Program Fund, Military Installation Development and Support
Fund;
(20) State Electrical Board: Electrical Division Fund;
(21) Military Department: Military Department Cash Fund, Governor's
Emergency Cash Fund, Nebraska Emergency Management Agency Cash Fund, Nebraska
Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Cash Fund;
(22) Board of Educational Lands and Funds: Surveyors' Cash Fund, Board of
Educational Lands and Funds Cash Fund, Survey Record Repository Fund;
(23) Game and Parks Commission: State Game Fund, State Park Cash Revolving
Fund, Nebraska Habitat Fund, Nebraska Aquatic Habitat Fund, Nebraska Snowmobile
Trail Cash Fund, Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund, Wildlife
Conservation Fund, Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund, Cowboy Trail Fund, Game
Law Investigation Cash Fund, Niobrara Council Fund, Nebraska Environmental
Endowment Fund, Hunters Helping the Hungry Cash Fund, Game and Parks Commission
Capital Maintenance Fund, Game and Parks State Park Improvement and Maintenance
Fund, Game and Parks Commission Educational Fund, Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around
Water Cash Fund, Trail Development and Maintenance Fund, Water Recreation
Enhancement Fund, Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund;
(24) Nebraska Library Commission: Nebraska Library Commission Cash Fund;
(25) Nebraska Liquor Control Commission: Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund;
(26) State Racing and Gaming Commission: Racing and Gaming Commission's
Racing Cash Fund, Racing and Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund, Track
Distribution Fund, Racetrack Gaming Fund;
(27) Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court: Compensation Court Cash Fund;
(28) Nebraska Brand Committee: Nebraska Brand Inspection and Theft
Prevention Fund;
(29) Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board: Nebraska Motor
Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund;
(30) State Real Estate Commission: State Real Estate Commission's Fund;
(31) Board of Barber Examiners: Board of Barber Examiners Fund;
(32) Department of Correctional Services: Department of Correctional
Services Facility Cash Fund, Reentry Cash Fund, Vocational and Life Skills
Programming Fund, Prison Overcrowding Contingency Fund, Parole Program Cash
Fund;
(33) Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission: State Educational
Telecommunications Fund, NEB*SAT Cash Fund;
(34) Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education: Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education Cash Fund, Nebraska Opportunity Grant
Fund, Guaranty Recovery Cash Fund, Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund, Door to
College Scholarship Fund, Community College Gap Assistance Program Fund;
(35) Nebraska State Colleges: Chadron Cash Fund, Peru Cash Fund, Wayne
Cash Fund, Chadron State College Designated Cash Fund, Peru State College
Designated Cash Fund, Wayne State College Designated Cash Fund, Board of
Trustees Cash Fund, State Colleges Sport Facilities Cash Fund;
(36) University of Nebraska: Financial Literacy Cash Fund, University Cash
Fund, Temporary University Fund, University of Nebraska at Omaha Cash Fund,
University of Nebraska Medical Center Cash Fund, University of Nebraska at
Kearney Cash Fund, University of Nebraska Central Administration Designated
Cash Fund, University of Nebraska-Lincoln Designated Cash Fund, University of
Nebraska at Omaha Designated Cash Fund, University of Nebraska Medical Center
Designated Cash Fund, University of Nebraska at Kearney Designated Cash Fund,
-71-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
State Anatomical Board Cash Fund;
(37) Nebraska State Fair Board: Nebraska State Fair Support and
Improvement Cash Fund;
(38) Real Property Appraiser Board: Real Property Appraiser Fund,
Appraisal Management Company Fund;
(39) Nebraska State Historical Society: Historical Society Fund,
Historical Landmark Cash Fund, Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Fund, Nebraska 150 Sesquicentennial Plate Proceeds Fund, Willa
Cather National Statuary Hall Cash Fund, Willa Cather Historical Building Cash
Fund, Semiquincentennial Commission Fund;
(40) Nebraska Wheat Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board:
Nebraska Wheat Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund;
(41) Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission: Oil and Gas
Conservation Fund, Carbon Dioxide Storage Facility Administrative Fund;
(42) Board of Engineers and Architects: Engineers and Architects
Regulation Fund;
(43) Board of Geologists: Geologists Regulation Fund;
(44) Nebraska Ethanol Board: Agricultural Alcohol Fuel Tax Fund, Ethanol
Production Incentive Cash Fund;
(45) Nebraska Dairy Industry Development Board: Nebraska Dairy Industry
Development Fund;
(46) State Board of Examiners for Land Surveyors: Land Surveyor Examiner's
Fund;
(47) Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy: Certified Public
Accountants Fund;
(48) Nebraska State Patrol: Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund, Investigation
Petty Cash Fund, Carrier Enforcement Cash Fund, Nebraska State Patrol Drug
Control and Education Cash Fund, Public Safety Cash Fund, Nebraska State Patrol
Vehicle Replacement Cash Fund, Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Cash
Fund, Combined Law Enforcement Information Network Cash Fund, State DNA Sample
and Data Base Fund, Treasury Agency Forfeitures Cash Fund;
(49) Department of Administrative Services: Building Renewal Allocation
Fund, State Building Renewal Assessment Fund, University Building Renewal
Assessment Fund, State College Building Renewal Assessment Fund, Capitol
Restoration Cash Fund, Vacant Building and Excess Land Cash Fund, Resource
Recovery Fund, Tort Claims Fund, Information Technology Infrastructure Fund,
Health and Life Benefit Administration Cash Fund, Rural Broadband Task Force
Fund, Community College State Dependents Fund, Ferguson House Fund;
(50) Abstracters Board of Examiners: Abstracters Board of Examiners Cash
Fund;
(51) Commission on Latino-Americans: Hispanic Awareness Cash Fund,
Commission on Latino-Americans Cash Fund;
(52) Nebraska Arts Council: Nebraska Arts Council Cash Fund, Nebraska Arts
and Humanities Cash Fund, Support the Arts Cash Fund;
(53) Foster Care Review Office: Foster Care Review Office Cash Fund,
Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund;
(54) Department of Economic Development: Job Training Cash Fund,
Administrative Cash Fund, Affordable Housing Trust Fund, Civic and Community
Center Financing Fund, Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund, Bioscience
Innovation Cash Fund, Nebraska Film Office Fund, Customized Job Training Cash
Fund, ImagiNE Nebraska Cash Fund, Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment
Fund, ImagiNE Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund, Nebraska Transformational Project
Fund, Site and Building Development Fund, Economic Recovery Contingency Fund,
Innovation Hub Cash Fund, Nebraska Rural Projects Fund, Shovel-Ready Capital
Recovery and Investment Fund, Panhandle Improvement Project Cash Fund, Youth
Outdoor Education Innovation Fund;
(55) State Board of Landscape Architects: State Board of Landscape
Architects Cash Fund;
(56) Nebraska Power Review Board: Nebraska Power Review Fund;
(57) Nebraska Investment Council: State Investment Officer's Cash Fund;
(58) Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice: Nebraska
Law Enforcement Training Center Cash Fund, Law Enforcement Improvement Fund,
Victim's Compensation Fund, Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash
Fund, Violence Prevention Cash Fund;
(59) Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired: Commission for the
Blind and Visually Impaired Cash Fund;
(60) Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing: Commission for the Deaf
and Hard of Hearing Fund;
(61) Community College Aid: Nebraska Community College Aid Cash Fund,
Community College Future Fund;
(62) Department of Water, Energy, and Environment: Integrated Solid Waste
Management Cash Fund, Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Fund,
Environmental Cash Fund, Chemigation Costs Fund, Low-Level Radioactive Waste
Cash Fund, Petroleum Release Remedial Action Cash Fund, Wastewater Treatment
Operator Certification Cash Fund, Local Site Selection Cash Fund, Local
Monitoring Committee Cash Fund, Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund,
Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund, Remedial Action Plan
Monitoring Fund, Livestock Waste Management Cash Fund, Drinking Water
Administration Fund, Clean Air Title V Cash Fund, Air Quality Permit Cash Fund,
Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund, Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System
Certification and Registration Cash Fund, Solid Waste Landfill Closure
Assistance Fund, Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Permit and Approval
Cash Fund, State Energy Cash Fund, Clean-burning Motor Fuel Development Fund,
-72-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Volkswagen Settlement Cash Fund, Renewable Fuel Infrastructure Fund,
Engineering Plan Review Cash Fund, Environmental Safety Cash Fund, Nebraska
Environmental Response Cash Fund, Water Well Standards and Contractors'
Licensing Fund, Safe Drinking Water Act Cash Fund, Dredge and Fill Cash Fund,
Lead Service Line Cash Fund, Water Resources Cash Fund, Small Watersheds Flood
Control Fund, Nebraska Resources Development Fund, Nebraska Soil and Water
Conservation Fund, Natural Resources Water Quality Fund, Water Well
Decommissioning Fund, Water Resources Trust Fund, Department of Water, Energy,
and Environment Cash Fund, Water Sustainability Fund, Critical Infrastructure
Facilities Cash Fund, Dam Safety Cash Fund, Perkins County Canal Project Fund,
Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund, Surface Water Irrigation
Infrastructure Fund;
(63) Public Employees Retirement Board: School Expense Fund, Judges
Expense Fund, State Patrol Expense Fund, Deferred Compensation Expense Fund,
State Employees Retirement System Expense Fund, County Employees Retirement
System Expense Fund, State Cash Balance Expense Fund, County Cash Balance
Expense Fund, Class V School Employees Retirement System Management Work Plan
Fund;
(64) Dry Bean Commission: Dry Bean Development, Utilization, Promotion,
and Education Fund;
(65) Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission: Nebraska
Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund;
(66) Corn Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board: Nebraska Corn
Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund;
(67) Commission on Indian Affairs: Commission on Indian Affairs Cash Fund,
Chief Standing Bear National Statuary Hall Cash Fund, Native American
Scholarship and Leadership Fund;
(68) Nebraska Tourism Commission: State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund,
Tourism Conference Cash Fund, Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash
Fund;
(69) Grain Sorghum Development, Utilization, and Marketing Board: Grain
Sorghum Development, Utilization, and Marketing Fund, Grain Sorghum National
Checkoff Fund;
(70) Tax Equalization and Review Commission: Tax Equalization and Review
Commission Cash Fund;
(71) Commission on Public Advocacy: Legal Education for Public Service and
Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund, Commission on Public Advocacy
Operations Cash Fund, Legal Aid and Services Fund, Civil Legal Services Fund;
(72) Dry Pea and Lentil Commission: Dry Pea and Lentil Fund; and
(73) Commission on African American Affairs: Commission on African
American Affairs Cash Fund.
Sec. 301. FEDERAL FUNDS.
The receipts for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 inuring to the several Federal
Funds, together with any amounts held in account by the State Treasurer on June
30, 2025, are hereby credited to each of the funds respectively. Expenditure of
Federal Funds appropriated in this act shall not be limited to the amount
shown.
Any Federal Funds, not otherwise appropriated, any additional Federal
Funds made available to the credit of the State Treasurer, and any amounts on
hand in any such Federal Funds on June 30, 2025, are hereby appropriated to the
expending agency designated by the federal government or, if none is
designated, to such expending agency as may be designated by the Governor.
For any capital construction project for which federal funds are
allocated, any federal funds not otherwise appropriated, any additional funds
made available to the credit of the State Treasurer, and any unexpended
balances in federal funds on the operative date of this act are hereby
appropriated and reappropriated to the agency and project.
Sec. 302. REVOLVING FUNDS.
The receipts for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 inuring to the several Revolving
Funds, together with any amounts held in account by the State Treasurer on June
30, 2025, are hereby credited to each of the funds respectively. Expenditure of
Revolving Funds appropriated in this act shall be limited to the amount shown
by program except when specific exceptions are made. The amounts appropriated
in this act include the following funds:
(1) Governor: Governor's Policy Research Office Revolving Fund;
(2) Secretary of State: Records Management Micrographics Services
Revolving Fund;
(3) Attorney General: Department of Justice Revolving Fund;
(4) State Department of Education: State Department of Education Revolving
Fund;
(5) Department of Agriculture: Management Services Expense Revolving Fund;
(6) Department of Correctional Services: Correctional Industries Revolving
Fund, Federal Surplus Property Fund, Department of Correctional Services
Warehouse Revolving Fund;
(7) Nebraska State Colleges: The money accruing to the Auxiliary
Enterprise Revolving Funds for student activity fees, dormitory rentals,
dormitory operations and maintenance, cafeteria operations, and student union
operations at Chadron, Peru, and Wayne State Colleges, and the State College
Capital Improvement Fund;
(8) University of Nebraska: University of Nebraska-Lincoln Revolving Fund,
University of Nebraska at Omaha Revolving Fund, University of Nebraska Medical
Center Revolving Fund, University of Nebraska Medical Center Medical Education
Revolving Fund, University of Nebraska at Kearney Revolving Fund, University
-73-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Tractor Test Revolving Fund;
(9) Nebraska State Patrol: Capitol Security Revolving Fund; and
(10) Department of Administrative Services: Department of Administrative
Services Revolving Fund, Materiel Division Revolving Fund, Communications
Revolving Fund, Transportation Services Bureau Revolving Fund, Capitol
Buildings Parking Revolving Fund, State Building Revolving Fund, Central Stores
Revolving Fund, State Surplus Property Revolving Fund, Information Management
Revolving Fund, Temporary Employee Pool Revolving Fund, State Insurance Fund,
State Self-Insured Indemnification Fund, Accounting Division Revolving Fund,
Intergovernmental Data Services Program Revolving Fund, Workers' Compensation
Claims Revolving Fund, Personnel Division Revolving Fund, Training Revolving
Fund, Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund, Shared
Services Revolving Fund, Capital Commission Revolving Fund.
Sec. 303. TRUST FUNDS.
The receipts for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 inuring to the several trust
funds, together with any amounts held in account by the State Treasurer on June
30, 2025, are hereby credited to each of the funds respectively, which funds
are hereby appropriated for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27:
(1) Attorney General: State Settlement Trust Fund, Nebraska Opioid
Recovery Fund;
(2) State Treasurer: Highway Trust Fund, Highway Tax Trust Fund, Bessey
Memorial Fund, Common School Fund, Highway Revenue Bonds Redemption Trust Fund,
Revenue-Sharing Trust Fund, Michael B. Amos Educational Trust Fund, James M.
Amos Educational Trust Fund, Excess Liability Fund, Insurance Investments Inc.
Trust Fund, Financial Responsibility Act Trust Fund, Importing Dealers Trust
Fund, Special Fuel Dealers Trust Fund, Nebraska Cultural Preservation Endowment
Fund, College Savings Plan Program Fund, Escheat Trust Fund, life insurance
corporation demutualization trust fund, Agricultural College Endowment Fund;
(3) State Department of Education: State Department of Education Trust
Fund, temporary school fund;
(4) Public Service Commission: Public Service Commission Elevator Trust
Fund;
(5) Department of Revenue: State Lottery Operation Trust Fund, State
Lottery Prize Trust Fund, Municipal Equalization Fund;
(6) Department of Insurance: Premium and Retaliatory Tax Suspense Fund;
(7) Department of Labor: State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund;
(8) Department of Motor Vehicles: Motor Vehicle Responsibility Act Fund;
(9) Department of Health and Human Services: Dormant Trust Funds,
Institution Canteen Amusement Trust Funds, Alcoholism Contribution Trust Fund,
Visual Impairment Trust Fund, Finance and Support Trust Fund, State Wards
Accounts Trust Fund, Medically Handicapped Children Trust Fund, Store and
Canteen Accounts Trust Fund, Welfare and Club Accounts Trust Fund, Juvenile
Trust Fund, Nebraska Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund, Nebraska Medicaid
Intergovernmental Trust Fund;
(10) Department of Transportation: Aeronautics Trust Fund, Highway
Restoration and Improvement Bond Fund;
(11) Department of Veterans' Affairs: Veterans' Aid Income Fund, Nebraska
Veteran Cemetery System Endowment Fund;
(12) Board of Educational Lands and Funds: Nebraska Veterans' Aid Fund,
Permanent University Fund, permanent school fund, Normal School Endowment
Investment Fund, Agricultural Endowment Fund, Agricultural and University Land
Lease Fund;
(13) Nebraska Library Commission: Nebraska Library Commission Trust Fund;
(14) Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court: Workers' Compensation Trust
Fund;
(15) Department of Correctional Services: Store and Canteen Accounts Trust
Fund, Welfare and Club Accounts Trust Fund, Inmate Trust Fund;
(16) Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission: Public Radio
Nebraska Foundation Trust Fund, Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Trust
Fund;
(17) Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education: Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education Trust Fund, SUN-MART Scholarship Trust
Fund;
(18) Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges: State College
Endowment Fund, Education Enhancement Trust Fund, LB 1100 Construction Trust
Fund, Davis Scholarship Trust Fund;
(19) Nebraska State Colleges: Student Activity Trust Funds at Chadron,
Peru, and Wayne State Colleges, Wayne State Bequests Trust Fund, Wayne State
College Electronic Funds Transfer Loan Trust Fund, Peru State Construction
Trust Fund, Peru State College Corrections Workforce Development Pathway Trust
Fund, Risk Loss Trust;
(20) University of Nebraska: University Trust Fund, University of Nebraska
at Omaha Trust Fund, University of Nebraska Medical Center Trust Fund,
University of Nebraska at Kearney Trust Fund, University of Nebraska-Lincoln
Federal Student Loan Trust Fund, University of Nebraska Medical Center Student
Loan Trust Fund, University of Nebraska at Omaha Electronic Funds Transfer
Trust Fund, University of Nebraska at Omaha Federal Student Loan Trust Fund,
Deferred Maintenance Project Trust Fund, Nebraska College of Technical
Agriculture at Curtis Scholarship Trust Fund, UNMC RHOP Loan Trust Fund, UNL
Minority Students Scholarship Trust Fund, UNMC Capital and Program Reserve
Trust Fund;
(21) Nebraska State Historical Society: Hall of Fame Trust Fund, Library
Archives Trust Fund, Nebraska State Historical Society Collections Trust Fund,
-74-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
Bridge Book Sale Trust Fund;
(22) Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission: Oil and Gas
Conservation Trust Fund;
(23) Department of Administrative Services: Master Lease Program Trust
Fund, NIS Operating Trust Fund, Flexible Spending Fund, State Employees
Insurance Fund, Capitol Preservation, Restoration, and Enhancement Endowment
Fund;
(24) Nebraska Arts Council: Nebraska Arts Council Trust Fund, Nebraska
Cultural Preservation Endowment Fund;
(25) Department of Water, Energy, and Environment: Hazardous Waste Sites
Trust Fund, Leaking Underground Storage Tanks Trust Fund, Wastewater Treatment
Facilities Construction Loan Fund, Drinking Water Facilities Loan Fund,
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund, Recycled Principal Fund, Nebraska Energy
Settlement Fund; and
(26) Public Employees Retirement Board: Annuity Reserve Fund, Nebraska
Retirement Fund for Judges, Contingent Fund, School Employees Savings Fund,
State Patrol Retirement Fund, School Employers Deposit Fund, Service Annuity
Fund, Retired Teachers Supplementary Benefits Fund, State Equal Retirement
Benefit Fund, County Equal Retirement Benefit Fund, County Employees Retirement
Fund, Judges Contingent Trust Fund, State Patrol Contingent Trust Fund, School
Operating Trust Fund, School Retirement Fund, State Cash Balance Retirement
Fund, County Cash Balance Retirement Fund, Class V Retirement System Payment
Processing Fund.
Sec. 304. REFUND AND DISTRIBUTIVE FUNDS.
The receipts for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27 inuring to the several refund and
distributive funds, together with any amounts held in account by the State
Treasurer on June 30, 2025, are hereby credited to each of the funds
respectively, which funds are hereby appropriated for FY2025-26 and FY2026-27:
(1) State Treasurer: Car Line Refund Fund, Insurance Tax Fund, Highway
Allocation Fund, Aircraft Fuel Tax Fund, Severance Tax Fund, Suspense Fund,
State Treasurer's Land Sales Distributive Fund;
(2) State Department of Education: Public Grazing Fund, Forest Reserve
Fund, Flood Control Fund, Insurance Tax Fund;
(3) Department of Labor: Income Tax Setoff Fund;
(4) Department of Motor Vehicles: International Registration Plan
Distributive Fund, International Fuel Tax Agreement Fund;
(5) Department of Health and Human Services: Child Support Operations
Distribution Fund, Supplemental Security Income Distribution Fund, Food
Distribution Fund;
(6) Department of Transportation: State Aid Bridge Fund;
(7) Nebraska Library Commission: NEBASE Fund;
(8) Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education: State Student
Incentive Grant Match Fund;
(9) Department of Administrative Services: Imprest Payroll Distributive
Fund, State Purchasing Card Distributive Fund; and
(10) Public Employees Retirement Board: Deferred Compensation Fund.
Sec. 305. GENERAL FUND TRANSFERS.
(1) The State Treasurer shall make the transfers specified in this section
from the General Fund to the designated fund, in the amounts indicated. Unless
otherwise noted, transfers for FY2025-26 shall occur on July 1, 2025, or as
soon thereafter as administratively possible, and transfers for FY2026-27 shall
occur on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible. All
agencies with administrative responsibilities for these funds shall assist the
State Treasurer as needed in implementing the transfers.
(2) Transfers from the General Fund for FY2025-26 shall include transfers
to:
(a) The Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund: $115,000 less the unexpended
balance existing on June 30, 2025, in (i) the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund,
(ii) the Investigation Petty Cash Fund, (iii) any special checking account or
accounts used by the Nebraska State Patrol, and (iv) the possession of agency
personnel involved in investigations, when the unexpended balances resulted
from General Fund transfers to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund or from
General Fund appropriations. Any transfers made shall be subject to a final
reconciliation of available investigation cash fund balances as of June 30,
2025, by the Nebraska State Patrol.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Nebraska State Patrol have
available a total of $115,000 from the General Fund for FY2025-26 to be used in
making drug purchases, for enforcing Nebraska laws relating to felonies, for
enforcing the Nebraska liquor laws, and for payment of investigative expenses;
(b) The Property Tax Credit Cash Fund: $422,000,000 on or before December
15, 2025, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services;
(c) Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund: $875,000 on or
before December 31, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services;
(d) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund: $780,000,000 on
or after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such date as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services; and
(e) The Education Future Fund: $242,000,000 on or after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
-75-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
(3) Transfers from the General Fund for FY2026-27 shall include transfers
to:
(a) The Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund: $115,000 less the unexpended
balance existing on June 30, 2026, in (i) the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund,
(ii) the Investigation Petty Cash Fund, (iii) any special checking account or
accounts used by the Nebraska State Patrol, and (iv) the possession of agency
personnel involved in investigations, when the unexpended balances resulted
from General Fund transfers to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund or from
General Fund appropriations. Any transfers made shall be subject to a final
reconciliation of available investigation cash fund balances as of June 30,
2026, by the Nebraska State Patrol.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Nebraska State Patrol have
available a total of $115,000 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to be used in
making drug purchases, for enforcing Nebraska laws relating to felonies, for
enforcing the Nebraska liquor laws, and for payment of investigative expenses;
(b) The Property Tax Credit Cash Fund: $442,000,000 on or before December
15, 2026, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services;
(c) Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund: $875,000 on or
before December 31, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services;
(d) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund: $808,000,000 on
or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such date as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services; and
(e) The Education Future Fund: $242,000,000 on or after July 1, 2026, but
before June 30, 2027, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 306. CASH, REVOLVING, AND TRUST FUND LAPSES AND TRANSFERS.
The State Treasurer shall make the transfers specified in this section
between funds, in the amounts indicated. Unless otherwise noted, transfers for
FY2025-26 shall occur on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as
administratively possible, and transfers for FY2026-27 shall occur on July 1,
2026, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible. All agencies with
administrative responsibilities for these funds shall assist the State
Treasurer as needed in implementing the transfers.
(1) Transfers for FY2025-26 shall include:
(a) From the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to the University of
Nebraska Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied Diseases Cash Fund:
$500,000 pursuant to section 81-638;
(b) From the Roads Operations Cash Fund to the Carrier Enforcement Cash
Fund: $13,075,900 less the unexpended balance existing on June 30, 2025, in the
Carrier Enforcement Cash Fund. Transfers shall be made in four equal quarterly
amounts on or before July 15, October 15, January 15, and April 15;
(c) From the State Building Revolving Fund to the Capitol Security
Revolving Fund: $1,429,602 less the unexpended, unobligated balance existing on
June 30, 2025, in the Capitol Security Revolving Fund. Transfers shall be made
in four equal quarterly amounts on or before July 15, October 15, January 15,
and April 15. Transfers shall be made to pay non-General-Fund costs associated
with the operation of the state capitol security division of the Nebraska State
Patrol;
(d) From the Highway Trust Fund to the Motor Fuel Tax Enforcement and
Collection Cash Fund: $1,400,000. Transfers shall be made in twelve equal
monthly amounts;
(e) From the Highway Trust Fund to the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund:
Up to a maximum of $1,400,000. Transfers shall be made as required by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to operate the Division of Motor Carrier Services;
(f) From the Civic and Community Center Financing Fund to the Department
of Revenue Enforcement Fund: $43,900 on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as
administratively possible, as provided for in sections 13-2704 and 77-5601;
(g) From the Highway Trust Fund to the License Plate Cash Fund:
$3,554,058. Transfers shall be made as required by the Department of Motor
Vehicles to meet the expenditures of plate and sticker production;
(h) From the Flexible Spending Trust Fund to the Health and Life Benefit
Administration Cash Fund: $140,000 except that if the total available
unobligated balance of forfeitures in the Flexible Spending Trust Fund as of
June 30, 2025, is less than $140,000 then the State Treasurer shall transfer
the difference, not to exceed $140,000 from the State Employees Insurance Fund.
Transfers shall be made to pay the costs associated with the administration of
the Flexible Spending Account program;
(i) From the State Employees Insurance Fund to the Health and Life Benefit
Administration Cash Fund: $1,097,174 less the June 30, 2025, unobligated Health
and Life Benefit Administration Cash Fund balance;
(j) From the Severance Tax Fund to the Municipal Rate Negotiations
Revolving Loan Fund: $10,000 pursuant to section 57-705;
(k) From the Severance Tax Fund to the State Energy Cash Fund: $300,000
pursuant to section 57-705. Transfers shall be made in twelve equal monthly
amounts;
(l) From the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund to the Sector
Partnership Program Fund: $300,000 on or before July 15, 2025, on such date as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services;
-76-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
(m) The State Treasurer shall transfer up to $1,500,000 from the Petroleum
Release Remedial Action Cash Fund to the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund on or
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. Transfers shall be made as required by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment and used pursuant to subdivision (2)(i) of section
66-1519;
(n) From the State Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund: $295,957 on
or before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services;
(o) From the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for Public
Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund: $150,000 on or
before July 15, 2025, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services;
(p) From the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash
Fund: $200,000 on or before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services; and
(q) From the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Cash Fund to the
Underground Storage Tank Fund: $50,000 on or before June 30, 2026, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(2) Transfers for FY2026-27 shall include:
(a) From the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to the University of
Nebraska Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied Diseases Cash Fund:
$500,000 pursuant to section 81-638;
(b) From the Roads Operations Cash Fund to the Carrier Enforcement Cash
Fund: $13,325,900. Transfers shall be made in four equal quarterly amounts on
or before July 15, October 15, January 15, and April 15;
(c) From the State Building Revolving Fund to the Capitol Security
Revolving Fund: $1,482,214. Transfers shall be made in four equal quarterly
amounts on or before July 15, October 15, January 15, and April 15. Transfers
shall be made to pay non-General Fund costs associated with the operation of
the state capitol security division of the Nebraska State Patrol;
(d) From the Highway Trust Fund to the Motor Fuel Tax Enforcement and
Collection Cash Fund: $1,400,000 less the unobligated balance in the Motor Fuel
Tax Enforcement and Collection Cash Fund on June 30, 2026. Transfers shall be
made in twelve equal monthly amounts;
(e) From the Highway Trust Fund to the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund:
Up to a maximum of $1,400,000. Transfers shall be made as required by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to operate the Division of Motor Carrier Services;
(f) From the Civic and Community Center Financing Fund to the Department
of Revenue Enforcement Fund: $43,900 on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as
administratively possible, as provided for in sections 13-2704 and 77-5601;
(g) From the Highway Trust Fund to the License Plate Cash Fund: Up to a
maximum of $2,592,174. Transfers shall be made as required by the Department of
Motor Vehicles to meet the expenditures of plate and sticker production;
(h) From the Flexible Spending Trust Fund to the Health and Life Benefit
Administration Cash Fund: $140,000 except that if the total available
unobligated balance of forfeitures in the Flexible Spending Trust Fund as of
June 30, 2026, is less than $140,000 then the State Treasurer shall transfer
the difference, not to exceed $140,000 from the State Employees Insurance Fund.
Transfers shall be made to pay the costs associated with the administration of
the Flexible Spending Account program;
(i) From the State Employees Insurance Fund to the Health and Life Benefit
Administration Cash Fund: $1,121,274;
(j) From the Severance Tax Fund to the Municipal Rate Negotiations
Revolving Loan Fund: $10,000 pursuant to section 57-705;
(k) From the Severance Tax Fund to the State Energy Cash Fund: $300,000
pursuant to section 57-705. Transfers shall be made in twelve equal monthly
amounts;
(l) From the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund to the Sector
Partnership Program Fund: $300,000 on or before July 15, 2026, on such date as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services;
(m) The State Treasurer shall transfer up to $1,500,000 from the Petroleum
Release Remedial Action Cash Fund to the Superfund Cost Share Cash Fund on or
before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services. Transfers shall be made as required by the Department of Water,
Energy, and Environment and used pursuant to subdivision (2)(i) of section
66-1519;
(n) From the State Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund: $295,957 on
or before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services;
(o) From the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for Public
Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund: $150,000 on or
before July 15, 2026, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services;
(p) From the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash
Fund: $200,000 on or before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as
-77-

LB261 LB261
2025 2025
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services; and
(q) From the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Cash Fund to the
Underground Storage Tank Fund: $50,000 on or before June 30, 2027, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 307. REAPPROPRIATION OF STATE AGENCY BYRNE GRANTS.
The unexpended General Fund, Cash Fund, and Federal Fund appropriation
balances existing on both June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, are hereby
reappropriated for the following agencies and programs:
(1) Agency 11 — Program No. 575;
(2) Agency 46 — Program No. 575;
(3) Agency 64 — Program No. 575; and
(4) Agency 78 — Program No. 575.
Sec. 308. There is hereby appropriated, unless otherwise specified, for
FY2025-26 and for FY2026-27 from undisbursed balances existing on June 30,
2025, and on June 30, 2026, respectively, to each agency for each program from
the respective funds for capital construction as follows:
(1) Agency No. 25 — Department of Health and Human Services
Program Nos. 919, 931, and 936.
(2) Agency No. 27 — Department of Transportation
Program No. 901, except that the unobligated biennium appropriation
balance shall lapse once all projects funded in that biennium are completed,
postponed to a future biennium, or indefinitely postponed.
(3) Agency No. 28 - Department of Veterans' Affairs
Program Nos. 936 and 938.
(4) Agency No. 31 — Military Department
Program Nos. 913, 914, 925, 927, 990, and 992.
(5) Agency No. 33 — Game and Parks Commission
Program Nos. 900, 901, 902, 919, 924, 955, 960, 965, 966, 967, 968, 969,
971, 972, 973, 975, 976, 977, 979, 981, and 987.
(6) Agency No. 46 — Department of Correctional Services
Program Nos. 905, 906, 913, 914, 921, 927, 928, and 929.
(7) Agency No. 47 — Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission
Program Nos. 908, 920, 928, 930, 931, 932, and 991.
(8) Agency No. 50 — Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges
Program Nos. 903, 906, 919, 920, 921, 931, 933, 940, 953, 955, and 996,
and any additional construction programs administratively created relating to
the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges and its campuses which are
funded through cash funds, federal funds, revolving funds, or private gifts or
donations.
(9) Agency No. 51 — University of Nebraska
Program Nos. 901, 902, 903, 906, 910, 911, 912, 913, 916, 917, 918, 920,
922, 923, 924, 925, 928, 929, 931, 932, 933, 934, 939, 941, 944, 945, 954, 955,
977, 980, 983, 984, 985, 987, 990, 993, and 994, and any additional
construction programs administratively created relating to the University of
Nebraska-Lincoln, the University of Nebraska at Omaha, the University of
Nebraska Medical Center, the University of Nebraska at Kearney, the Nebraska
College of Technical Agriculture at Curtis, and the University of Nebraska
Central Administration that are funded through cash funds, federal funds,
revolving funds, or private gifts or donations.
(10) Agency No. 64 — Nebraska State Patrol
Program No. 904.
(11) Agency No. 65 — Department of Administrative Services
Program Nos. 901, 917, 922, 980, 986, and 994.
Appropriations to program numbers pertaining to funding for the Deferred
Building Renewal Act other than Program number 940 are hereby reappropriated.
(12) Agency No. 78 — Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice
Program No. 903.
Sec. 309. The One Hundred Ninth Legislature acknowledges that Article
III, section 22, of the Constitution of Nebraska provides that each Legislature
shall make appropriations for the expenses of the government. Consistent with
this provision, any appropriations enacted by prior Legislatures for fiscal
years beginning after June 30, 2025, are null and void unless specifically
reaffirmed by this Legislature.
Sec. 310. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 311. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed
and approved according to law.
-78-